








Alfano, Michael C.




































NYU.edu requires JavaScript be enabled in your browser in order to use important features of the site. JavaScript is either disabled or not supported by your browser. For instructions on how to enable JavaScript in your browser, click here.



Skip to Content
Skip to Search
Skip to Navigation
Skip to Sub Navigation




















Main Navigation


About 


Admissions/Academic Programs 



Departments/Faculty 



Research 


Student Life 


Alumni 


CDE 


Global Reach 


Patients 


donate 


historical 


Dental Tide Redirect 


advisorycouncil 


smilingfaces 


clinicalresearch 


rarebooks 








Departments/Faculty>Full-time Faculty Directory



Faculty Information












Michael C. Alfano, DMD, PhD
Professor Emeritus
Basic Science and Craniofacial Biology

E-mail: mca1@nyu.edu
Education

Certificate, Periodontics, Fairleigh Dickinson University School of Dentistry 1976
PhD, Nutritional Biochemistry & Oral Biology, Massachusetts Inst. of Technology, Dept. of Nutrition & Food Science, 1971-1974
Trainee, Periodontics, Harvard University School of Dental Medicine, 1971-1973
DMD, University of Medicine & Dentistry of New Jersey 1971
BS, Biology, Rutgers University 1967

Research Interests / Professional Overview

Improving the Quality and Efficiency of Higher Education, especially Dental Education
Enhancing Oral and General Health through Better Therapy, Public Education, and Challenging the Dental Profession
Promotion of Improved Interactions Among Academic, Industrial and Government
Scientists, the Regulatory Agencies and the Public
Evaluation of New Products for the Personal Care, Dental, and Pharmaceutical Industries
Pathogenesis and Therapy of Periodontal Disease; Nutrition in Oral Health

Representative Publications
Complete listing available on the NYU Health Sciences Library site.
Search PubMed for articles.
Alfano, M.C.: "The Origin of Gingival Fluid" J. Theoretical Biol.47: 127-136, 1974
Alfano, M.C., Morhart, R., Metcalf, G. and Drummond, J.F.: "Presence of Collagenase from Clostridium Histolyticum in Gingival Sulcal Debris of a Primitive Population" J. Dent. Res. 53:142, 1974
Alfano, M.C.: "The Effect of Ascorbic Acid Deficiency on the Barrier Function of Guinea-
Pig Oral Mucosal Epithelium" Doctoral Thesis, 1974, Institute Archives, Massachusetts Institute of Technology Alfano, M.C., Drummond, J.F., and Miller, S.A.: "Technique for Studying the Dynamics of Oral Mucosal Permeability in Vitro" J. Dent. Res. 54: 194, 1975
Alfano, M.C., Miller, S.A., Drummond, J.F.: "Effect of Ascorbic Acid Deficiency on the Permeability and Collagen Biosynthesis of Oral Mucosal Epithelium" Ann. NY Acad. Sci. 258:253-263, 1975
Alfano, M.C., Drummond, J.F., and Miller, S.A.: "Localization of the Rate-Limiting Barrier to the Penetration of Endotoxin through Non-Keratinized Oral Mucosa In Vitro" J. Dent. Res. 54: 1180-1182, 1975
Inouye, L., Miller, S.A. and Alfano, M.C.: "The Lingual Ascorbic Acid Test: Lack of
Correlation with Blood and Tissue Levels of Ascorbic Acid in Guinea-Pigs" J. Dent
 Res. 54:1143-1148, 1975
Alfano, M.C.: "The Role of the Host in Periodontal Disease" J.W. S. .Perio. 23:105-107, 1975
Alfano, M.C.: "Controversies, Perspectives and Clinical Implications of Nutrition in Periodontal Disease" Dent. Clin. North Amer. 20:519-548, 1976
DePaola, D.P. and Alfano, M.C.: "Tri-Phasic Nutritional Analysis" Dent. Clin. North Amer. 20: 613-633, 1976
Alfano, M.C., Kaslick, R.S., Chasens, A.I. and Brownstein, C.N.: "Passively Generated Increase in Human Gingival Crevicular Fluid Flow" J. Dent. Res. 55:1132, 1976
DePaola, D.P. and Alfano, M.C.: "Nutrition and Oral Health" Nutrition Today 12:6-32, 1977
Feingold, J., Chasens, A.I., Doyle, J.L. and Alfano, M.C.: "Preserved Scleral Allografts in Periodontal Defects in Man" J. Periodont. 48:4-12, 1977
Alfano, M.C., Chasens, A.I. and Masi, C.W.: "Autoradiographic Study of the Penetration of Radiolabelled Dextrans and Inulin through Non-Keratinized Oral Mucosa In Vitro" J. Periodont. Res. 12:368-377, 1977
Alfano, M.C.: "Prospective Improvements in the Prevention of Periodontal Disease" J. Prev. Dent. 5:26-29, 1978
Alfano, M.C., DePaola, D.P.: "Methods for Assessing Nutritional Status in Dental Practice" Quintessence Int. 9:115-125, 1978
Alfano, M.C.: "Effect of Acute Ascorbic Acid Deficiency on the DNA Content and Permeability of Guinea-Pig Oral Epithelium" Archs. Oral Biol. 23:929-932, 1978
Gillespie, B.R., Chasens, A.I., Brownstein, C.N. and Alfano, M.C.: "Relationship Between the Mobility of Human Teeth and Their Supracrestal Fiber Support" J. Perio. 50:120-124, 1979
Saroff, S., Alfano, M.C., Chasens, A.I. and King, W.: "Sonicated Passively Dispersed Hydrogen Peroxide in Periodontitis: Effects on Clinical Parameters and Myeloperoxidase Activity" J. Perio. Res. 15:216-222, 1980
Alfano, M.C.: "Nutrition, Sweeteners and Dental Caries" J. Food Tech. 34:70-74, 1980
Vogel, R.I., Deasy, M.J., Alfano, M.C. and Schneider, L.C.: "Effect of Folic Acid on Gingival Health in Women Taking Contraceptives" J. Prev. Dent. 6:221-227, 1980
Alfano, M.C.: "Diet and Nutrition in the Etiology and Prevention of Oral Disease" J. Dent. Res. 59:2194-2202, 1980
Alfano, M.C.: "Dental Caries: The Nature of the Problem" Cereal Foods 26:5-9, 1981
Vogel, R.I., Alfano, M.C. and Manhold, J.H.: "The Effect of Intrasulcular Brushing on Sulcular Epithelial Permeability" J. Periodont. 52:224-250, 1981
Alfano, M.C.: "Nutrition in Dental Practice: A Plea for Sanity" New York State Dent. J. 47:450-452, 1981
Ritchey, T.W., Lamster, I.B., Mann, P.H. and Alfano, M.C.: "The Effect of Zinc Chloride on the Development of Gingivitis in Beagle Dogs Treated with Cetylpyridinium Chloride" J.Dent. Res. 61:1217-1220, 1982
Lamster, I.B., Alfano, M.C., Seiger, M.C., Gordon, J.M.: "The Effect of Listerine Antiseptic on Reduction of Existing Plaque and Gingivitis" Clin. Prev. Dent. 5:12-16, 1983
Howell, T.H., Reddy, M.S., Li, K.L., Alfano, M.C., Weber, H.P., Kaplan, M.C., Vogel, R., Williams, R.C.: "Inhibition of Plaque Formation, Prevention and Treatment of Gingivitis with Sulfadiazines in Beagles" J. Dent. Res. 68 (Spec. Issue): 1712-1713, 1989
Howell, T.H., Reddy, M.S., Weber, H.P., Li, K.L., Alfano, M.C., Vogel, R., Tanner, A.C.R., Williams, R.C.: "Sulfadiazines Prevent Plaque Formation and Gingivitis in Beagles" J. Periodont. Res. 25:197-200, 1990
Howell, T.H., Reddy, M.S., Weber, H.P., Li, K.L., Alfano, M.C., Vogel, R., Tanner, A.C.R., and Williams, R.C.: "Sulfadiazines Reduce Gingivitis and Plaque Formation in Beagle Dogs" J. Clin. Periodontol. 17:734-737, 1990
Smith, M.A., Braswell, L.D., Collins, J.G., Boyd, D.L., Jeffcoat, M.K., Reddy, M., Li, K.L., Wilensky, S., Vogel, R., Alfano, M.C. and Offenbacher, S.: "Changes in Inflammatory Mediators in Experimental Periodontitis in the Rhesus Monkey" Infection and Immunity 61:1453-1459, 1993
Li, K.L., Vogel, R., Jeffcoat, M.K., Alfano, M.C., Smith, M.A., Collins, J.G.,
Offenbacher, S: "The Effects of Ketoprofen Creams on Periodontal Disease in Rhesus
Monkeys" J. Periodont. Res. 31:525-531, 1996
Khandwala, A., Van Inwegen, R.G., Alfano, M.C.: "5% Amlexanox Oral Paste A New Treatment for Recurrent Minor Aphthous Ulcers I. Clinical Demonstration of Acceleration of Healing and Resolution of Pain" Oral Surg Oral Med Oral Path Oral Radiol Endod 83:222-230, 1997
Khandwala, A., Van Inwegen, R.G., Charney, M.R. Alfano, M.C.: "5% Amlexanox Oral Paste A New Treatment for Recurrent Minor Aphthous Ulcers II. Pharmacokinetics and Demonstration of Clinical Safety" Oral Surg Oral Med Oral Path Oral Radiol Endod 83:231-238, 1997
Alfano, M.C.: "Dental Education: One Dean's Perspective" Journal Am College Dent. 68:8-12, 2002
Alfano, M.C.: "Titanium and Terrorism: The role of the implant dentist. Journal of ICOI (in press) 2003
Gordon, S.M., Heft, M.W., Dionne, R.A., Jeffcoat, M.K., Alfano, M.C., Valachovic, R.V., Lipton, J.A.: Capacity for Training in Clinical Research: Status and Opportunities J. Dent. Educ. 67:622-629, 2003
More, F.G., Phelan, J., Boylan, R., Glotzer, D., Psoter, W., Robbins, M., Rekow, E.D, Alfano, M.C.: "Predoctoral Dental School Curriculum for Catastrophe Preparedness" J. Dent. Ed. 68: 851-858, 2004.
Psoter, W.J., Alfano, M.C., Rekow, E.D.: "Meeting a Disaster's Medical Surge Demand"
CDA Journal 32: 694-700, 2004
Spielman, A.I., Fulmer, T., Eisenberg, E.S., Alfano, M.C.: "Dentistry, Nursing and Medicine: A Comparison of Core Competencies" J. Dent. Ed. 69: 1257-1271, 2005
Glotzer, D., More, F.G., Phelan, J., Boylan, R., Psoter, W.J., Robbins, M., Rekow, E.D., Godder, B., Alfano, M.C.: "Introducing a Senior Course on Catastrophe Preparedness into the Dental School Curriculum" J. Dent. Ed. (Submitted)
Petropoulis, V.C., Arbree, N.S., Tarnow, D., Rethman, M., Malmquist, J., Valachovic, R., Brunson, W.D., Alfano, M.C.: "Dean's American Dental Education Association Implant Workshop Survey" J. Dent. Ed. (Submitted)
 



















		
			Academic Programs
		
		
	


 DDS Program



 Dental Hygiene Programs



 Advanced Education Programs



 Master's Degree Programs



 Programs for International Dentists



 



 Linhart Continuing Dental Education Program (CDE)








		
			Research
		
		
	


 Research at NYU Dentistry



 Bluestone Center for Clinical Research



 HIV/AIDS Research Program (HARP)



 NYU Center for Skeletal and Craniofacial Biology (CSCB)








		
			Patient Care
		
		
	


 Become a Patient at NYU Dentistry



 Emergency Services / Urgent Care



 General Dentistry



 Pediatric Dentistry



 Oral & Maxillofacial Surgery



 Orthodontics



 Implant Dentistry



 Endodontics



 Periodontics



 Prosthodontics



 Special Needs Program



 Patient Advocate



 Linhart CDE Program



 NYU Dental Faculty Practices



 NYU Oral Cancer Center








		
			Quick Links
		
		
	


 About Us



 Admissions Information



 Academy of Distinguished Educators



 Interprofessional Education



 Current Students



 Intranet



 Departments/Faculty



 Global Reach



 News, Publications and Facts



 Working at NYU Dentistry



 Contact Us



 Directions








		
			Connect
		
		
	



NYU College of Dentistry
345 E. 24th Street
(corner of First Avenue)
New York, NY, 10010





		
			(212) 998-9800
		
		
	




NYUCD Facebook Page
NYUCD Twitter Page
NYUCD YouTube Page
NYUCD LinkedIn Page


MAKE A GIFT










		Copyright © New York University College of Dentistry
	

Feedback













A Conversation with Dr. Michael Alfano | ID | dentalaegis.com

































































DentalAEGIS
Compendium
Inside Dental Technology
CDEWorld
SUBSCRIBE















Menu





Articles
Archive
CE
eBooks
Webinars
Products
Resource Center
Special Issues
Manufacturer Index








View Current Issue



					Noteworthy Categories
		        
CE Articles
Feature Stories
Roundtable
Viewpoint



					Editorial Categories
		        
CAD/CAM
Diagnosis & Treatment Planning
Digital Imaging
Endodontics
Implantology
Infection Control
Magnification
Materials
Occlusion
Oral Medicine
Orthodontics
Pain Management
Pediatric Dentistry
Periodontics
Practice Management
Prevention
Prosthodontics
Restorative Direct
Restorative Indirect






				September 2010
				
				Volume 6, Issue 8
			




A Conversation with Dr. Michael Alfano The executive vice president of New York University discusses trends in higher education and its effects on dental schools and the delivery of dental healthcare.  Inside Dentistry’s newest board member, James B. Bramson, DDS, president of Bramson&Company, holds an in-depth conversation with Michael C. Alfano, DMD, PhD, executive vice president of New York University, discussing a wide range of topics that reveal the width and depth of these leaders’ many years of experience and wisdom in the clinical profession as well as academia. Inside Dentistry (ID): Mike, you have a long and varied history in the dental world. Tell our readers a little about your background and experiences and how they have shaped your perspective over the years. MA: My education has been a terrific asset in achieving a varied and fulfilling career. After completing my dental degree from UMDNJ, I received a PhD in nutrition from MIT and training in periodontics at Harvard. During my training in Massachusetts, I practiced general dentistry part time, then I spent 8 years teaching, doing research, consulting, and managing my own periodontal practice in New Jersey. In 1982, I became the vice president for dental research at the Block Drug Company (now a unit of GSK), ultimately becoming senior vice president for global research, technology and quality assurance, and a member of the Board of Directors at Block. I wanted to be working in academia at the end of my career, so in 1998 I rejoined the academy and became dean of the College of Dentistry at New York University. In 2006, I assumed my present position as executive vice president of NYU. ID: What kind of lessons did you learn in industry that you use in your administrative work in education? MA: Going back to academia was intimidating—I didn’t know if my corporate world skills would translate or be valuable to an educational institution. It turns out that they were enormously helpful, because more than anything, I had learned the value of administrative efficiency, goal setting, team building, and prudent budgeting. Indeed, as I think back on my time as dean, my most important observation—which I now hold as an axiom—was that: Great economics builds great academics, not the other way around. A corollary to this axiom (for any deans who might be reading this) is: A dean with money to spend has a perceived IQ that is 75 points higher than a dean who is broke! ID: I thought your response about the lessons you learned in industry that you use in education was interesting. Can you expand on that? MA: I fundamentally enjoy the academic side, and I thought the freedom of academics would allow me to create a career that would provide more self-fulfillment. In the corporate world, you have to follow a prescribed direction that comes from the very highest levels of the company. However, the corporate world can be more like academia. It’s not nearly as autocratic as most people on the outside think, and you can move much more quickly. I remember once interviewing for a position, but I was a little hesitant to give up writing grants in areas of interest to me. Then the CEO asked me, “So how long does it take for you to get one of those grants?” When I explained that 18 months would be considered fast, he responded, “Well, if you come down here and convince me of a great idea, you could be spending that money in 18 minutes.” So that was fairly compelling—and the truth of the matter is that it did happen. If they were good ideas, you could move on them fairly quickly. ID: What’s the best piece of advice you ever received? MA: I have been blessed by many mentors along the way, but the best advice came from my father when I was a child: Education is the only thing that can’t be taken from you. Use it wisely. Always tell the truth, and have the courage of your conviction to stand on the principles you value. This question leads me to reflect a bit on leadership. There are thousands of leadership programs available today that teach administrative and management skills, and help people to build a network. However, they do not teach key leadership traits like integrity, vision, charisma, passion, and, perhaps most importantly, courage. These critical attributes cannot be taught, they can only be modeled for others to see—and my father was an amazing role model. ID: Speaking some more about leadership, do you think the dental schools could do a better job of teaching leadership—emphasizing ethics, integrity, and those kinds of traits?  MA: I feel very strongly that you can teach administrative and managerial skills. But some of the core elements of leadership are traits that I don’t think can be taught—like courage and passion. They can be modeled, and we have all seen people who are really passionate about issues. However, I think these leadership institutes, as they are frequently called, misrepresent their product. By all means, they can be extraordinarily valuable. But I just don’t think you can teach passion, integrity, charisma, and the like. ID: Did you look for some of those traits in the students you were recruiting to NYU? MA: We certainly looked for independent thinkers when we were recruiting students. I think that’s one of the attributes of future leaders. Obviously, we looked for integrity. But it’s very hard to do this in a setting that basically allows for a single interview at best and a set of recommendations from people who are by definition favorably inclined to be positive. ID: Can you tell us about a key challenge or turning point for you? MA: I could go back to my childhood and talk about growing up poor, but hey, you’ve heard dozens of those stories. I think it would be better to talk about a relatively recent event, which proved to be an enormous challenge and perhaps the toughest assault ever on my integrity and courage. It began mid-decade when NYU decided to merge its College of Nursing into the College of Dentistry. We did this because of educational synergies and a recommendation by the Institute of Medicine urging healthcare providers be educated in teams. Most importantly, it was to explore the idea that if nurse practitioners were affiliated with dentists, the 30 to 40 million people who visit a dentist—BUT NOT A PHYSICIAN—each year would have access to the diagnostic skills and therapeutic intervention of a nurse practitioner. Leading a dental school with the chance to test a very important model of healthcare intervention that could help the citizenry, reduce national healthcare costs, and position dentistry even more solidly as a primary healthcare profession was the most significant opportunity in my professional career. Then the backlash hit. Suffice it to say that organized dentistry did not take well to this possible innovation at all. It reminded me of the way the profession tried to thwart the beginning of the dental hygiene profession in 1910 in Ohio. Yet, today there are about 300 dental hygiene programs in the United States. In any case, the most difficult challenge for me wasn’t retaining my own beliefs that this model had to be tested, but rather the threats made against the NYU College of Dentistry. It is one thing to go down personally for your beliefs, it is quite another to risk an institution that was 140 years old at the time. However, with strong support from the University, and the encouragement of enlightened leaders in dental education, the educational model prevailed, has prospered, and has even been recognized for its innovation by some of the same organizations that balked at the outset. While it remains to be seen if this model will be adopted in private practice, it is already making substantial improvements in the quality of education for dental, dental hygiene, and nursing students at NYU. ID: With regard to what happened with NYU and the College of Nursing, that’s not an unusual type of approach when a group is faced with something entirely new. Do you think there is a fear of the unknown that outweighs those opportunities that come from change—and that’s why people fight so strongly against change?  MA: Yes, I think that’s always the case. It’s a cliché to say that change is hard. But because everyone operates within a comfort zone, once you create some parameters that might require people to work outside that zone, there’s an uneasiness that the outcomes won’t be beneficial. So I wasn’t surprised that the profession—particularly the New York State Dental Association—would have concerns about what we were doing. What surprised me was the almost venomous nature of their approach to understanding it—and I am being kind when I say “venomous.” They wanted to kill it sight unseen without understanding any of the implications. They saw it as an assault on the integrity of the dental profession. Truth be told, some considered the dental profession to be at a higher level than the nursing profession, and therefore any comingling of faculty or the name of the institution by definition would draw down its reputation. It was an extraordinarily difficult time—but not because I couldn’t take the heat. I was concerned that they would also harm a venerable institution. That would damage not only the people who worked there and graduated from there, but also the profession, because I believe it’s important that private research universities continue to want dental schools in their sphere of control. Had it gone badly, one could see that NYU might back away and maybe even give up on both dentistry and nursing. That would have been a huge tragedy—all because we were inspired by what could be if people would have an open mind about letting it take its course. ID: It seems that in a lot of these instances you have to deal with the doubt. I always hear, “We don’t know the unintended consequences of our actions here.” How do you counter that? MA: It’s difficult because the comment is true. Unintended can also be “unknown” consequences. And it’s very difficult to play out a move all the way down the chessboard to see what other consequences might come into play. Basically, we thought we were on solid ground in terms of being consistent with both accrediting agencies’ requirements. Also with the idea that what we expect from an institution of higher education is the ability, if not the downright mission, to innovate across all that it does, including educational paradigms. At a time when costs of dental education were spiraling up—as they always do—the thought of leveraging faculty in certain effective ways was attractive, simply in terms of the academic model. As I said, that’s not what drove the university to do this—what drove the university to do this was the idea that this just might be a new way to create access to healthcare for people who don’t normally visit a physician. We do know there are millions of people with these chronic diseases who could benefit from earlier diagnosis. The thought of being able to intercept before the disease becomes more difficult to manage was the compelling idea that we wanted to evaluate. ID: Higher education is under some assault these days—lack of affordability, questions about value, decreased outside funding, and the list goes on. What do you see as the major challenges in higher education in general? MA: This is a very timely question. Higher education is under significant assault these days. With costs escalating at near double the inflation rate for the past 40 years, Americans have had about all they can take. As we say at NYU, the higher education reset button has been pressed. Getting into specifics on this would try the patience of your readers. Suffice it to say that institutions of higher education in the United States have already begun to employ many of the techniques of the corporate world using tools like re-engineering, re-structuring, outsourcing, right-sizing, and the like. So far, the efficiencies at most institutions have come behind the scenes, but change is likely to come to the academic components soon. Indeed, in some state systems, and smaller private colleges, academic changes replete with faculty furloughs, partnerships with “for profit” educational entities, and increased teaching loads have already begun. Perhaps most importantly, the days of tuition increases at twice the rate of inflation are over. ID: Well, if it’s about the need to learn more about new skills and efficiencies and business modeling, can you tell me what’s at the root of that? Is it lack of incentive? Is it tenure? What are the for-profit universities doing, and are they building a better business model to educate people?  MA: I think one of the signature problems for higher education is that it often doesn’t recognize who its stakeholders are. So if you ask a group of academics who the stakeholders of the universities are, the most common answer would be “the faculty.” I’ve asked that question, so I can say this with some experience. There are some members of the faculty who would say “the students.” That’s a pretty darned good answer, and I think that’s the level at which the for-profits are operating—and I believe that’s an appropriate level to be operating at. The bigger picture for the not-for-profits is that the stakeholders, I believe, are the citizens. There are about a half dozen substantial tax breaks that are offered to not-for-profits. And the expectation by society is that it derives value by allowing those institutions to prosper just a little bit more than if they have to pay taxes. For a few hundred years now, that model has delivered excellent value for the American citizenry. In more recent years (which I would define as the last four or five decades), the cost has been escalating at rates that—to use a popular buzzword—are not sustainable. Increasingly, the attitude of the American people is that this is just out of control. At the institutional level, in some ways higher education looks a bit like healthcare. What do I mean by that? It’s very hard for individuals to assess the value of what they have just purchased. You know if you like your physician or not; you know if he or she is personable. You don’t know for sure if they are proffering the best kind of care for you or if they are doing this surgical procedure at the highest skill level. But they believe that they are, and you have to trust them. So too with education. You are going on reputation. For example, do you like the geography? Do you like how the tour guide functioned? And so forth. Not every reputation is important, but that’s part of it. Then you factor in the way these services are paid for. For the vast majority of Americans, healthcare is paid for by third party payers, typically supported by the corporations that create the payrolls. In higher education, it’s also largely subsidized by third parties in the form of grants directly from the university or various scholarship programs, along with highly subsidized loans that are made available through the federal government with some state participation, as well. Therefore, it’s very hard to judge the quality of the product or the service that is being purchased while you are receiving it. Also, there is less concern about the typical spending habits of individuals because you are not writing a check or opening your wallet to pay for it. When you have scenarios like that—and you throw in some of the other issues, like the expense and constant change of technology on which they are highly dependent—it’s a recipe for very rapid escalation of cost. There’s also a bit of star power involved—medical centers strive to get the biggest, best names in surgery onto their faculties. So too with universities. And that tends to escalate salaries. ID: Would you agree that the ongoing economic climate is not going to support those kinds of subsidies?  MA: Absolutely. As I mentioned before, the reset button has been pressed. The state of Massachusetts, for example, introduced a bill that begins to tax all the endowments over $1 billion (and there are 11 of these across the state). They’re not happy with the way the institutions are returning the growth on those endowments, and also they need tax revenue. The city of Pittsburgh proffered a tax on tuition for all the universities in the city to pay as one vehicle to solve its budget problems. And the US Senate directed the IRS to investigate institutions of higher education to ensure they are not abusing their tax-free privileges. From these examples, you can get a sense there is a pretty high level of dissatisfaction with that aspect. If you were to survey American voters on how they feel about US higher education, they would say: it’s the best in the world, we’re so happy we have it, we’re a better country for it. So they’re not really assaulting the universities for what they have done, but for how they have done it. And how they have paid for it. We just took the lowest tuition increase in 23 years—so we’re adjusting to that. We’re putting pressure on faculty salaries, trying to operate the institution at a smaller spread between the tuition increase and the salary increase. Traditionally at NYU, there has been a two points’ difference. If tuition goes up 7%, salaries can go up 5%. Now with tuition going up 3.5%, where can salaries go? Well, they can’t increase more than 3.5%. But clearly, if they go up only 1.5%, you run the risk of not being able to recruit or retain faculty. So you need to compress that difference. We have tried to do that by making the business part of the university more efficient. ID: Based on your experiences and outreach, and the major challenges to dental education and dentistry, how do you see the profession responding? MA: When I left the dental deanship and NYU recruited Charles Bertolami, a very talented leader, to replace me, I deliberately tried to remove myself, not only from the NYU dental school, but also from active participation in the profession—although I retain membership in the ADA. However, while things have gone very well at the school, that is not the case with the profession, and I have been slowly drawn back to observe and comment, because I care too deeply about the profession that has afforded me such a fulfilling career. Troubling trends are developing in both the educational and the practice arms of the profession of dentistry. If you were to assess how dentists moved from barber surgeon tradesmen to highly respected professionals, most would conclude that the signature change came when the educational component moved from apprenticeship, through proprietary schools, to university-affiliated dental schools—especially affiliations with research universities. Since the early 20th century, there has been a healthy mix of dental schools affiliated with research universities and those sited at less research-intensive parent institutions. The balance in the numbers of research intensive and non-research intensive dental schools is shifting, with essentially all of the new schools affiliated with institutions that are not research-intensive. To be sure, these new schools usually have distinguished leaders, and they all endeavor to bring something important to the table: community-based learning and service, education in collaboration with other health professionals, sharp focus on recruiting particular types of dentists, and so forth. However, I believe that the last dental school to open within a research-intensive university was the University of Florida in 1972—almost 40 years ago. Thus, while good outcomes can come from establishing new dental schools at non-research intensive institutions, these 20 or so newly opened or planned schools are creating an imbalance between those based at research-oriented parent institutions and those sited at other types of institutions. To make matters worse, the research-oriented schools are concerned that they will be at a competitive economic disadvantage because sustaining a research enterprise comes with significant associated costs. They are also concerned about maintaining growth in the science base of dentistry and sustaining the esteem of the profession. Thus, they recently convened a group of some 27 schools in the Midwest to ponder the situation. While the concerns of the leaders of such schools are understandable, the discussions that took place would have been better at a national meeting with all dental schools in attendance. Dividing the small enterprise of dental education into subgroups of schools would be a huge mistake. This is a time for more dialogue, collaboration, and understanding—not less. The American Dental education Association showed great leadership a few years ago when it invited all components of dental health education to the table for membership. In contrast, the risk of creating multiple “affinity” groups of dental schools is high, and dental education in the United States will not be well served by such divisiveness. Finally, we should all consider why such great institutions as Harvard, Columbia, and Michigan were pleased to welcome dental schools onto their campuses more than 100 years ago, but Stanford, Chicago, and Yale would be unwilling to do so today. ID: Why wouldn’t a Stanford or Chicago or Yale want to have a dental school?  MA: I have an answer, but it’s difficult to state. I think that in the eyes of Stanford, the profession of dentistry has lost esteem. Maybe 100 years ago, had the opportunity availed itself to Stanford, it would have had a dental school. But I think it’s extraordinarily unlikely that they would today. I just had a discussion with the president of a very prestigious university who said they’re not sure that dental schools can contribute to the kind of academic dialogue that they would like to have on their campuses. This is very disturbing when it looks like the nation needs 20 more dental schools, and not one of them is going to be sited at what most would agree is a reasonably intensive research institution. I know of two research-orientated institutions who have danced with the possibility of creating a dental school. One was Rochester, which is a fine institution that would have loved to have started a dental school, and the other was Texas Tech, which is less well-known but growing in research stature. If we can get just a few of these places to agree that it is appropriate to initiate a dental school, then my concerns are mitigated substantially. The fact that there have been none, I find to be a very worrisome trend. ID: Since you are concerned about whether this movement is going to retard the advancement into scientific frontiers in dentistry—will there still be that drive in research? With that assumption, why hasn’t industry stepped in to replace what goes on in research institutions?  MA: I think it’s fair to say there are many other ways that dental science can be advanced other than a dental school doing the research. In fact, I think 50% of the NIDCR budget goes to nondental institutions. So there is no question that the science can continue to advance. But the worry is: where will the passion for the value of research to the profession come from, if not from dental professionals who have been schooled in the value of research and who have the potential to contribute? You could argue that a school with no research capacity can teach the value of research. But if there are no schools actually doing that research, it can become a very shallow exercise, particularly over the profession as a whole. ID: Should we be concerned about conflicts of interest in industry-sponsored research?  MA: One obligation of dental education is to teach how to properly read and understand the literature. And part of evaluating the literature is to understand the origin and design of a particular study. So corporate research per se can be every bit as valuable as—or sometimes more valuable than—research funded by foundations, private philanthropists, or the federal government. However, sometimes research becomes very product-specific and is not as valuable in terms of advancing the profession. I think there’s good and bad research, regardless of the sponsor—that’s the way I would look at it. As a recipient of public grants, I would look someone squarely in the eye and defy them to show that I used a lesser standard in those studies than I did with NIH support. But there’s no question, the reason we disclose the source of the monies is so people can assign a value to it and be appropriately suspicious (or not) about whether there is any inherent bias. ID: When you put your ear to the ground, what are you hearing these days? MA: My network isn’t quite what it used to be, but what I do hear troubles me. In addition to the problems in education that I just mentioned, I understand that divisiveness is in the air within organized dentistry. Having failed to learn a lesson from the way the dental therapist issue in Alaska was managed, it seems unable to craft a workable solution to address the public cry for better access to dental care. Indeed, as we talk, there are at least two groups of state dental societies meeting separately to discuss alternative approaches to access. One group seems to be focusing on how best to deploy a so-called “mid-level dental practitioner” within the context of the current dental healthcare delivery system. I have had the opportunity to speak to this group, and they seem to be taking a responsible approach to a very difficult problem. The other newly formed group may be taking more of a position to preserve the status quo. This approach did not work in Alaska, did not prevail in Minnesota (which seems to be moving forward in a progressive manner), and it typically fails to offer a viable alternative to increasing access to care. I understand the ADA has scheduled a meeting on this topic this summer, and I hope that it can catalyze healthy discussion that will not simply create a legal or a PR strategy, but a more broad-based approach that actually begins to deal with the problem of access. It is difficult to be optimistic, but I have my hopes for this to be successful. ID: One of the duties of that leadership is to make sure that people see, hear, and understand both sides. Now, regarding lack of access to dental care, it seems that there are new players, new parties—specifically, organized patient advocacy groups—who are somewhat changing the debate. They are increasingly vocal. How do you see the new players beginning to change the debate or maybe the strategy?  MA: Excellent point. I think that brings us full circle to the comments I made earlier about who are the stakeholders of the universities. Once again, we are talking about the citizenry. If we have learned anything about the way this country works, it’s that ultimately the citizens have a great deal of power. It may take them a while to understand the issues, but once they do, they will throw people out of office. They will lobby aggressively for different kinds of legislation. I think we are seeing that happen now. Dental care has been on the horizon for upwards of a decade as a major issue motivating the citizenry. The fact that it took some time is not surprising, it always does. But now that there have been some successes by such lobbying efforts, I think we will inevitably see more. The momentum behind this has been pent-up for so long, it’s a problem that’s going to find a solution. ID: Specifically, how do you see the access to lack of dental care dilemma being addressed? MA: There is no doubt that in the long run the American public will get the access to dental care that it desires—and deserves. I think that it is inevitable that a mid-level dental practitioner, or dental therapist, or an advanced dental hygiene practitioner will arise on a state-by-state basis. The only question is whether or not the dental profession will elect to embrace these new models and bring these new practitioners into the current model of dental care. A well conceived framework for the role of dental therapists can be good for the public, but also good for dentistry. The arrival of such practitioners will allow the dentist to focus more on diagnosis, the management and treatment of difficult cases, and the expansion of the role of dentistry as a primary healthcare profession. Nurse practitioners and physician assistants have proven to be very useful in medicine, and a dental version of NPs and PAs would most likely be effective too. Indeed, such models have been successful in highly developed countries for almost 100 years. Perhaps it is time to get this right in the United States. ID: Where do you see the next great opportunities for the dental profession? Oral–systemic associations? Medical model of care? New delivery models? Salivary diagnostics? MA: I think each of the areas you mentioned is ripe for expansion, but at rates that are very likely to disappoint the avant-garde thought leaders in the profession. Dentistry is traditionally a late adopter of new pharmacotherapeutics. In fact, it has always struck me as a bit strange that the dental profession primarily uses stainless steel and carbides to treat its signature infectious diseases—caries and periodontal disease—while the rest of the healthcare world uses pharmacotherapy as a principle mode for infection management. Although recent developments in salivary diagnostics are fascinating, I do not see the dental profession deploying them widely. To the extent that, for example, systemic cancer can be detected in salivary analyses, the use of such technology will bypass the dentist and be utilized directly by physicians and NPs. ID: Is the problem with adopting some of the new technologies, deliveries, or diagnostics really the reimbursement system we have that rewards procedural-based care?  MA: That is the most significant part of the problems, although there are other reasons. It could really be how dentists view themselves. Do they view themselves as primary care providers? Do they view themselves with full authority to write prescriptions for whatever the patient’s oral health seems to warrant—smoking cessation prescriptions, for example, or to help medicate patients for a given periodontal disease? Or do they see themselves as surgeons who basically use only a handful of drugs—anesthetics, analgesics, and antibiotics—in order to effect technical treatments in the oral cavity? Why is the dental profession disproportionately treating infection with stainless steel? Because it sees itself primarily as a surgical profession. There is nothing inherently wrong with that. But we once used surgery to eliminate ulcers, and now no one has ulcer surgery anymore. By using methods that might not be the most cost-effective or the least intrusive, dentistry will miss the opportunities to manage the diseases that we are entrusted to treat. ID: It seems as though the medical models that are really showing promise—like Kaiser and those types of models that are designed around teams, wellness, and total care—have found ways to adopt best practices and analytics, outcome measures, and report cards that help them understand better ways for measuring what they are really doing. Do you agree?  MA: I think you’re right. The hope is that these practice-based networks can deliver that for dentistry. They are expensive to run and controversial, but I think the need is there. There are many more of them in medicine, of course, and they are designed to get real-world data on exactly the things you are talking about. ID: NYU is very engaged in higher education on a global scale. Can you comment on the global dental environment? MA: Dental education, like higher education in general, is going global. Twenty-five years ago, only a few US dental schools entertained the graduates of foreign dental schools for advance standing. Now, it has become commonplace. When I was dean of dentistry at NYU and had the opportunity to travel internationally, I marveled at how many dental offices displayed the NYU torch in their windows as a sign of pride (and perhaps for some competitive advantage) showing that they had been trained in the United States. Recognizing that the United States does not have a monopoly on talent, NYU is building an interconnected network of campuses that is very different from the typical study abroad programs. In the Global Network University that NYU is becoming, people from around the world can enter at a site and receive an NYU degree—yet never set foot in New York. At the moment, this programming is primarily based in Arts and Sciences, education, Law, and the Performing Arts, but all of the professional schools at NYU, including dentistry, will definitely be a part of it going forward. ID: As a reader I would say, okay, but what kind of implications does a global dental environment have for Joe Dentist on Main Street, if any?  MA: I think that, as in the rest of the world, there is a likelihood that they will have colleagues who were not born in the United States. And ultimately, as the world globalizes, I think that people in other countries will expect to have colleagues who were born in the United States. We’re barely at the threshold of free and easy movement of scholars and professionals around the world. I think it’s inevitable that it will happen. We certainly see it in higher education. We see it in the corporate world where talent is recruited regardless of where it might originate. I think the profession is well behind that curve, and we don’t see that happening in a widespread way, except for the number of schools that now offer programs with advanced standing for graduates of other dental schools. There were four or five of them 20 years ago. Now there are 40 schools that offer some type of advanced standing. That has changed significantly, and I think it is helping. ID: If you could change one thing about dentistry in the United States, what would it be? MA: Stop killing the messenger! The dental profession has been changing slowly for 200 years. It will continue to do so. Reflexive, narrow-minded defense of the status quo will not stop change—it never has. It may slow it down, but it will not stop it. Moreover, in the effort, dentistry takes on the look of a self-serving trade group, not a public health-minded profession, and the once-high esteem of the profession will fall further in the minds of the populace. ID: What frontiers are left for you and where are your next challenges? MA: I hope to “retire” in the next year or two to spend more time with my six grandchildren. I also hope to be able to get more active in dentistry again, perhaps by writing, consulting, and teaching. Finally, I have joined some not-for-profit boards, and hope to make some contributions to those organizations. ID: Any final comments?  MA: I appreciate the opportunity to participate, because the things I have been hearing are just so bothersome to me, and I don’t want us to go backwards. I wrote an article for Nexus, called “Dentistry: Circle Back, Circle the Wagons, or Circling the Moment.” The idea of circling back—which I didn’t make in this interview—is the extent that all the new dental schools are not affiliated with research institutions. By the way, the vast majority of these schools will take exception to that because they define research differently. So I understand that phrase will be controversial. But I worry that dentistry evolved from barber–surgeon to apprenticeships to proprietary (for-profit) schools to university settings. Not that there are propriety schools yet in dentistry, but you can see that almost around the corner. Once we go there, in my opinion, we are drifting back towards trends that are very, very unhealthy. About the Interviewees Michael C. Alfano, DMD, PhD, was named NYU’s executive vice president in June 2006. Prior to that, Dr. Alfano was dean of the NYU College of Dentistry, a post he had held since 1998; he continues as a professor of basic science and craniofacial biology at the College of Dentistry. Prior to that post, he was the senior vice president for research and technology and a member of the Board of Directors at the Block Drug Company, Inc, now a unit of GlaxoSmithKline. Dr. Alfano practiced general dentistry in Massachusetts and periodontics in New Jersey and served as a member of the National Advisory Dental Research Council of the National Institutes of Health (NIH). He is a former chairman of the American Dental Education Association (ADEA) Council of Deans, past-president of the Student Clinicians of the American Dental Association (ADA), member of the Future of Dentistry Committee of the ADA, the ADA Foundation’s Planning Committee for the National Campaign for Dental Education, the ADEA Commission for Change and Innovation in Dental Education, and the Association of Academic Health Centers’ Advisory Committee on Health Professions Workforce Shortages. Dr. Alfano is a founding director of both the Friends of the National Institute of Dental and Craniofacial research (NIDCR) and the Santa Fe Group.







				Stay up to date with 
									Inside Dentistry
				!
			







Inside Dentistry
Articles
Archive
CE
eBooks
News
Products
Subscribe




View All of Our Brands
Inside Dentistry
Compendium
Inside Dental Technology
CDE World




Contact Us
About Us
Advertisers
Creative Services






			© 2017 AEGIS Communications | Privacy Policy



















 











Michael C. Alfano Ph.D. - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In




















Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.
Board Member at DENTSPLY SIRONA Inc.


View Full Profile
Are you Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Michael C. Alfano Ph.D. through your network of contacts.
												








Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
DENTSPLY SIRONA Inc.


Past
To view Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
69

 
 


Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s Biography



Dr. Alfano currently serves as a Director on the Company's Board of Directors. Formerly, Dr. Alfano served as a DENTSPLY Director from 2001 through the Merger. Dr. Alfano is Executive Vice President Emeritus, and Professor and Dean Emeritus at New York University (''NYU''). Dr. Alfano served as Dean of the College of Dentistry from 1998 to 2006 and as Executive Vice-President of NYU from 2006 to 2013. Beginning in 1982 until 1998 he held a number of positions with Block Drug Company, including Senior Vice President for Research & Technology and President of Block Professional Dental Products Company. He served on the Board of Directors of Blo ...
(Read More)

			Dr. Alfano currently serves as a Director on the Company's Board of Directors. Formerly, Dr. Alfano served as a DENTSPLY Director from 2001 through the Merger. Dr. Alfano is Executive Vice President Emeritus, and Professor and Dean Emeritus at New York University (''NYU''). Dr. Alfano served as Dean of the College of Dentistry from 1998 to 2006 and as Executive Vice-President of NYU from 2006 to 2013. Beginning in 1982 until 1998 he held a number of positions with Block Drug Company, including Senior Vice President for Research & Technology and President of Block Professional Dental Products Company. He served on the Board of Directors of Block Drug Company, Inc. from 1988 to 1998. Dr. Alfano has served as a member of, or consultant to, various public health organizations, including the National Institutes of Health, the Editorial Board of the American Journal of Dentistry, the Consumer Healthcare Product Association and as the industry representative to the Non-Prescription Drugs Advisory Committee of the FDA from 2001 to 2005. He was a founding director of the Friends of the National Institute for Dental and Craniofacial Research, and he is a founding director of the not-for-profit Santa Fe Group. He was also a Trustee of the New York State Dental Foundation until 2006. From 2010-2015 he served as a director of the not-for-profit Delta Dental of New York Insurance Company. He also served as a Director of the YMCA of Greater New York, the largest YMCA system in the country, from 2010 to 2014. He has received numerous honors, research grants and awards, and currently serves as Senior Consultant to the Academy for Academic Leadership, and President of the Santa Fe Group.
Qualifications considered for Dr. Alfano included his education, training and experience as a dentist; his experience in research management and in a publicly traded medical technology company; his knowledge and experience in FDA matters; and his leadership role in the health and dental field.
		
Source: DENTSPLY SIRONA Inc. on 04/13/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Michael C. Alfano Ph.D. through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.


















Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s Connections (188)





Sign up now to view Michael C. Alfano Ph.D.'s 188 connections »









Harold S. Koplewicz
Former Board Member, Delcath Systems, Inc.









Bret W. Wise
Executive Chairman, DENTSPLY SIRONA Inc.









Heidi G. Miller
Board Member, General Mills, Inc.









Kenneth I. Chenault
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, American Express









Cheryl D. Mills
Board Member, BlackRock, Inc.









William F. Hecht
Former Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, PPL Corporation









James Dimon
Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer, JPMorgan Chase & Co.









Eric K. Brandt
Chairman of the Board, Yahoo! Inc.









Christopher T. Clark
President and Chief Operating Officer, Technologies, DENTSPLY SIRONA Inc.









James G. Mosch
Former President and Chief Operating Officer, Dental and Healthcare Consumables, DENTSPLY SIRONA Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









Jan Koum
Board Member, Facebook, Inc.









Robert D. Perlmutter
Senior EVP and COO, The Macerich Company












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993
















Michael C Alfano - New York, NY | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Michael C Alfano in New York, NY


Michael C Alfano

                                                                           Intelius found that Michael C Alfano  is  a male between 60 and 70 years old from New York, NY.  We have connected them to
                6 addresses,
                7 phones,
                and 3 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Age

Michael C Alfano is in his 60s

Michael Has Lived In

New York, NY
Framingham, MA
Franklin Lakes, NJ

Michael's Relatives

Joanne Alfano
Linda Chuss
Kristin Alfano







Michael C Alfano



Zodiac SignLeo



GenderMale



Professional Status
Chief Operating Officer at New York University



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Michael? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Michael, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Michael C Alfano
Get a Criminal Check on Michael C Alfano
Get a Public Record Report on Michael C Alfano
Get a People Search Report on Michael C Alfano


Michael C Alfano's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Michael C Alfano has lived as well as Michael C Alfano's phone numbers and email addresses.




Michael C Alfano Has Lived in 4 States
New York Address for Michael C Alfano


29 W********* S* W 

New York, NY


Has Lived In

New York, NY
Framingham, MA


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Michael C Alfano

(561) ***-**** - Jupiter, FL 
(212) ***-**** - New York, NY 
(212) ***-**** - New York, NY 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Michael C Alfano

m*****o@***.com
m**1@***.edu


Get Email Report




Michael C Alfano's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Michael C Alfano's academic history.  Find out which schools Michael C Alfano attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Michael C Alfano received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Michael C Alfano Has Attended 7 Schools
Massachusetts Institute of Technology 1971 – 1975               Michael C Alfano has a PhD in Nutritional Biochemistry and Oral Biology               
Massachusetts Institute of Technology               1971 – 1975               Michael C Alfano has a Phd, Nutritional Biochemistry and Oral Biology in Nutritional Biochemistry and Oral Biology               
Harvard University               1971 – 1974               Michael C Alfano has a  Periodontics/periodontology               
Harvard University               1971 – 1974                              
University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey               1967 – 1971               Michael C Alfano has a Dmd in Dentistry               
University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey               1967 – 1971               Michael C Alfano has a Dmd, Dentistry in Dentistry               
Archbishop Walsh High School               1961 – 1965                              


Michael C Alfano's Professional Information
Information regarding Michael C Alfano's professional history.  Find out previous places Michael C Alfano has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Michael C Alfano Has Worked at 6 Places
Company: New York University
               Title: Chief Operating Officer
Company: New York University
               Title: Professor, Dean and Executive Vice President Emeritus
Michael C Alfano's Experience
Title: Chief Operating Officer
               Company: New York University
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 bil and above - Employee Range: 5,000 to less than 25,000
Title: Professor, Dean and Executive Vice President Emeritus
               Company: New York University
Job Details
               Founded in 1831, New York University is the largest private university in the United States. The University, which is composed of 14 schools, colleges, and divisions, occupies five major centers in Manhattan. It operates branch campus and research programs in other parts of the United States and abroad, as well as study abroad programs in more than 25 countries. New York University is also one of the largest employers in New York City, with over 16,000 employees.
Additional Professional Information on Michael C Alfano

 See Michael C Alfano's LinkedIn Profile



Michael C Alfano's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Michael C Alfano


Michael C Alfano's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Michael C Alfano's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Michael Alfano
Username Matches

                  MichaelAlfano
                  AlfanoMichael
                  Michael.Alfano
                  Alfano.Michael
                  Michael_Alfano
                  Alfano_Michael
                  Michael-Alfano
                  Alfano-Michael
                  MAlfano
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
M Alfano







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.














XRAY Michael C. Alfano Insider Trades for Dentsply Sirona Inc.


































X

Tweet
 

Share this bulletin

Get news bulletins by email

Bulletin

Sean Spicer resigns as Trump's press secretary: New York Times »
        




Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Dentsply Sirona Inc.

                  NASDAQ: XRAY
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Dentsply Sirona Inc.



Market open
 --Real time quotes
Jul 21, 2017, 12:15 p.m.


XRAY

/quotes/zigman/67411405/composite


$
62.77




Change

-0.26
-0.41%

Volume
Volume 1.13m
Real time quotes








/quotes/zigman/67411405/composite
Previous close

$
			63.03
		


$
				62.77
			
Change

-0.26
-0.41%





Day low
Day high
$62.57
$63.43










52 week low
52 week high

            $55.00
        

            $65.68
        


















Insider Activity


Individual




Michael C. Alfano



Dr. Michael C. Alfano is Executive Vice President-Emeritus & Professor at New York University. He  is on the Board of Directors at DENTSPLY SIRONA, Inc. and Friends of the National Institute of Dental & Craniofacial. Dr. Alfano was previously employed as an Independent Director by DENTSPLY International, Inc., a Member by University of Pennsylvania, a Member by American Journal of Dentistry, Director, SVP-Research & Technology by Block Drug Co., Inc., President by Block Professional Dental Products Co., a Member by Consumer Healthcare Products Association, Founding Director by National Institute of Dental & Craniofacial Research, a Trustee by New York State Dental Foundation, and Founding Director by The Santa Fe Group. He also served on the board at Delta Dental of New York, Inc. and YMCA of Greater New York. He received his doctorate degree from the University of Medicine & Dentistry of New Jersey and a doctorate degree from Massachusetts Institute of Technology.



Transactions


Date
Shares
Transaction
Value





07/14/2017
2


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


05/25/2017
1,220


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


05/24/2017
1,395


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


05/21/2017
1,412


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


11/08/2016
2,091


 
Disposition at $60.81 per share.


127,154


11/08/2016
1,196


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $39.39 per share.


47,110


11/08/2016
414


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $41.07 per share.


17,002


11/08/2016
481


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $36.49 per share.


17,551


07/28/2016
182


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


05/26/2016
3,000


 
Disposition at $61.58 per share.


184,740


05/22/2016
1,593


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


05/21/2016
1,433


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


11/04/2015
2,500


 
Disposition at $62.15 per share.


155,375


07/31/2015
901


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


05/23/2015
1,739


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


05/12/2015
1,390


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


11/07/2014
20,000


 
Disposition at $51.23 per share.


1,024,600


11/07/2014
20,000


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $33.03 per share.


660,600


05/30/2014
2,764


 
Disposition at $47.25 per share.


130,599


05/25/2014
909


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


05/13/2014
787


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


05/12/2014
1,136


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


08/08/2013
1,185


 
Gift at $42.76 per share.


50,671





        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. Bret W. Wise 
Executive Chairman




Mr. Christopher T. Clark 
Co-President & COO-Technologies




Mr. Jeffrey T. Slovin 
Chief Executive Officer & Director




Mr. Ulrich  Michel 
Chief Financial Officer & Executive VP




Mr. Derek W. Leckow 
Vice President-Investor Relations




Mr. Joshua  Zable 
Vice President-Investor Relations




Ms. Maureen J. MacInnis 
Chief Human Resources Officer & Senior VP




Mr. Jonathan I. Friedman 
Secretary, Senior VP & General Counsel




Mr. Willie A. Deese 
Independent Director




Mr. Michael J. Coleman 
Independent Director




Mr. Harry M. Jansen Kraemer 
Independent Director




Mr. Eric K. Brandt 
Independent Director




Mr. Dave K. Beecken 
Independent Director




Dr. Michael C. Alfano 
Independent Director




Mr. Arthur D. Kowaloff 
Independent Director




Mr. Francis J. Lunger 
Independent Director




Dr. Thomas  Jetter 
Lead Independent Director









Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




12:15 PM EDT
July 21, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:06pHow Trump’s ‘greatest tax cut in history’ may impact you, in one simple calculator
12:06pBREAKINGWhite House press secretary Sean Spicer resigns, reports say 
12:04pWeekend roundup: Companies that may cut dividends | FAANG stocks and market bubbles | Enjoy London on the cheap
12:03pWhite House press secretary Sean Spicer resigns: reports
12:02pIf you care about the planet, don’t buy so much
12:00pThe reason Jack Bogle doesn’t fly first class says everything about his investing legacy
11:55aVornado Realty Trust stock price target cut to $81 from $95 at Morgan Stanley
11:54aAir France’s new millennial airline may be less annoying than it sounds
11:53aMicrosoft stock price target raised to $82 from $73 at UBS
11:53aGold aims for a second-straight weekly gain and highest finish in a month 
11:53aVisa stock price target raised to $112 from $102 at UBS
11:52aE-Trade stock price target raised to $48 from $44 at UBS
11:52aEBay stock price target raised to $40 from $38 at UBS
11:51aNIC Inc. downgraded to neutral from buy at Sidoti & Co.
11:41aTreasury yields fall as dovish comments from ECB’s Draghi fuel bond buying
11:35aWhy you might want to avoid these 30 dividend stocks
11:35aAttention, shoppers: ‘Amazon effect’ is creating bargain stocks
11:34aBREAKINGTrump orders report on how U.S. defense and industry are sourced
11:34aStock market pulls back from records; GE disappoints
11:34aLyft says it will build its own driverless car technology
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,558.52

-53.26
-0.25%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,383.59

-6.41
-0.10%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,470.15

-3.30
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


























































NYU Names Dr. Michael Alfano As Executive Vice President 





























































☰





About NYU




About NYU
Connecting talented and ambitious people in the world's greatest cities, our mission is to be a top quality institution.



In This Section


Leadership & University Administration




University Initiatives




News, Publications, and Facts




Careers at NYU




Visitor Information




Policies and Guidelines




Giving to NYU






Related Links


Contact Us


Events


History of NYU







Admissions




Admissions
Join our more than 40,000 students studying in hundreds of programs on six continents all around the globe.



In This Section


Undergraduate Admissions




Graduate Admissions




Financial Aid and Scholarships




Visiting Students




Fall in NY




January Term




Spring in NY




Summer Sessions




High School Programs






Related Links


Academic Programs


Schools and Colleges


Tuition and Fees


Studying Abroad







Academics




Academics
Our world-class students, faculty, and scholars expect high achievement in pursuit of engaging the world's diverse challenges.



In This Section


Academic Programs




Accelerated Studies




Schools and Colleges




Studying Abroad




Online and Technology-Enhanced Education




Continuing Education




Libraries




Centers and Institutes




Awards and Highlights




Academic Resources






Related Links


Undergraduate Admissions


Graduate Admissions


Financial Aid and Scholarships


Career Development







University Life




University Life
An institution without walls, we draw spirit from our cities and their famous cultural institutions and professional opportunities.



In This Section


Events and Traditions




Travel and Transportation




Safety, Health, and Wellness




Athletics




Arts, Culture, and Entertainment




Campus Resources




Information Technology




Global Support




Sustainability




Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion






Related Links


NYU News


University Initiatives


Events


Campus Map







Research




Research
Being at the forefront of their disciplines, our faculty shape the understanding of an enormous range of academic fields.



In This Section


University Research Policies




Resources and Support Offices




Research News




Centers, Institutes, and Research at Schools




Provost's Global Research Initiatives






Related Links


Faculty Awards and Accomplishments


Global Awards


Funding Opportunities








Information For: 


Students


Communities and Groups
Next Stop NYU
Getting Involved
Health and Wellness
Academic Services
Student Information and Resources
Student Channel Promos




Faculty


Teaching and Learning Resources
Research and Scholarship
Governance, Policies, and Procedures
Funding Opportunities
Faculty Housing
Benefits
Life & Wellness
Community Advantages
Faculty References
ofr-promos
Open Code Forms for Faculty
Faculty in the Global Network
Global Academic Partnerships and Affiliations
Faculty Visa & Immigration




Alumni




Employees


Resources and Services
HR @ Your Service
Career Development
Benefits
Life & Wellness
Employee Channel Promos




Community


Neighbors and Nonprofits
Parents
Community Promos
NYU: Community Channel Promos
Conference and Event Services
Government Affairs




Login to NYU Home


All NYU





















							Get Started
							
						



...
Click to see full trail




							
							About NYU
						



							
							News, Publications, and Facts
						



							
							NYU News
						



							
							2006
						



							
							June
						


					News Release
					
				







News Release
NYU Names Dr. Michael Alfano As Executive Vice President 




Jun 16, 2006
Jun 16, 2006


College of Dentistry
All University




							New York University President John Sexton today named Michael C. Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D., who has been dean of NYU’s College of Dentistry since 1998, to the post of executive vice president of NYU.  As executive vice president, he will oversee the University’s budget and finance operations, the human relations division, and the real estate, planning, and construction operations.  Dr. Alfano, whose career has included significant posts in both academics and business, will start in the new position on July 17, 2006. 
						











								Dr. Michael C. Alfano
							


New York University President John Sexton today named Michael C. Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D., who has been dean of NYU’s College of Dentistry since 1998, to the post of executive vice president of NYU.  As executive vice president, he will oversee the University’s budget and finance operations, the human relations division, and the real estate, planning, and construction operations.  Dr. Alfano, whose career has included significant posts in both academics and business, will start in the new position on July 17, 2006.
Dr. Alfano will be succeeding Jacob Lew, who has served as the University’s executive vice president since 2001.  Mr. Lew is leaving NYU to take a position in the private sector.
Dr. Sexton said, “I am very pleased that Michael Alfano, who has had an outstanding record of achievement as dean of NYU’s College of Dentistry after a career that included impressive responsibilities in both academe and the private sector, has agreed to accept my request that he assume the assignment of executive vice president.  As dean, he has been an extraordinary leader: admissions has become more selective and competitive; new roles for dentists and new models for health care education have been embraced; dental care for poor New Yorkers has been expanded; fundraising has been unprecedented, leading to the creation of important new facilities; and the Dental College has emerged as an important center for health care research.  Between his background, his familiarity with NYU, his commitment to the University’s academic advancement, and his talent for entrepreneurship and collegiality, it would have been all but impossible to find a better candidate for this position than Mike.
“The University is very fortunate to be able to turn to such a person, because the departure of Jack Lew leaves a large hole to be filled in the NYU community.  Jack - who came to NYU from President Clinton’s cabinet, where he was Director of the Office of Management and Budget - has brought extraordinary integrity, experience, and leadership to his post over these past five years.  He was a key architect in setting and achieving our goals and in helping us successfully confront our challenges, and his legacy will be felt for many years.
“On behalf of the entire NYU community, I would like to thank both Jack and Mike for the service they have given and continue to give NYU, and congratulate them on their new posts.”
Dr. Alfano has been dean of the NYU College of Dentistry since 1998, and a professor of periodontics and biological sciences there.  Prior to that, he served in a number of leadership positions with the Block Drug Company, Inc., including the presidency of the Block Professional Dental Products Company; Senior Vice President for Research and Technology; Scientific Affairs Advisor to the Chief Executive Officer; and membership on the Board of Directors, among other posts.  Prior to that experience, he was a tenured professor of periodontics and oral medicine at the Fairleigh Dickinson University School of Dentistry, where he also served as Assistant Dean for Postgraduate Affairs and Research.
He is the recipient of numerous awards and honors, including membership in Omicron Kappa Upsilon; the Distinguished Alumnus Award for the University of Medicine and Dentistry; the Distinguished Alumnus Award from the Harvard University School of Dental Medicine; appointment to the National Institutes of Health’s National Advisory Dental Research Council; honorary life membership by the International Congress of Oral Implantologists; honorary membership in the American Academy of Oral Medicine; the Jack Hein Public Service Award of the American Association for Dental Research; and the Edward Shils Award from the American Dental Association Foundation, among many others.  He is a member of numerous professional organizations, and has served on a number of prominent national committees.
Dr. Alfano’s research and areas of interest include improving the quality and efficiency of  higher education, especially dental education; enhancing oral and general health through better therapy, public education, and challenging the dental profession; evaluation of new products for the personal care, dental, and pharmaceutical industries; pathogenesis and therapy of periodontal disease; and nutrition in oral health.  He is the author of numerous original journal articles, texts, book chapters, and magazine articles, and he holds several patents.  
He received his undergraduate degree from Rutgers University, his D.M.D. from the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey, and his Ph.D. from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  He was a trainee in periodontics at the Harvard School of Dental Medicine, and he received his certificate in periodontics from the Fairleigh Dickinson University School of Dentistry.

New York University is located in the heart of Greenwich Village. Founded in 1831, NYU is this year celebrating its 175th anniversary.  It is one of America’s leading research universities and a member of the selective Association of American Universities.  It is one of the largest private universities, it is a leader in attracting international students and scholars in the U.S, and it sends more students to study abroad than any other U.S. college or university.  Through its 14 schools and colleges, NYU conducts research and provides education in the arts and sciences, law, medicine, business, dentistry, education, nursing, the cinematic and performing arts, music, public administration, social work, and continuing and professional studies, among other areas.


Press Contact
John Beckman
John Beckman
(212) 998-6848



 





			Related News
		



						Jul 17, 2017
					

						Kenneth Manotti Appointed Head of Development at NYU
					



						Jul 9, 2017
					

						Statement by NYU Spokesperson John Beckman
					



						Jul 7, 2017
					

						NYU Dentistry’s Dr. Nicole N. Scheff Receives $120,000-Plus NIDCR F32 Grant to Investigate the Biology of Sex Differences in Oral Cancer Pain
					






				Featured Articles
			






							2016-17 in Review
						






							What (Else) To Do When You're in Town for NYU's 2017 Commencement
						






							Meet the Class of 2017
						






							Advice from Alumni to #NYU2017
						




 






Search


Campus Map


Events


Contact Us


Copyright & Fair Use


Feedback



CONNECT WITH NYU


Facebook


Twitter


Instagram


Snapchat


+ More




ON THIS SITE

About NYU
Admissions
Academics
University Life
Research



MAIN CAMPUSES

New York
Abu Dhabi
Shanghai









New York University 

Students
Faculty
Alumni
Employees
Community



Unless otherwise noted, all content copyright
New York University. All rights reserved.








Feedback

Thank you for taking the time to give us feedback. Your feedback is essential to helping us improve the website
I have feedback for


This Page

Overall




Name

Email Address

Note any inaccurate, missing or recommended content in this page?

Note any broken links, images, or technical features on this page?

Please complete at least one field before submitting your feedback




Submit Feedback

Close




Name

Email Address

How would you rate the information on the website

Helpful

Somewhat Helpful

Not Helpful


How would you rate the ease of use on this website

Easy

Somewhat Easy

Difficult


What do you like most about the website?

What do you dislike most about the website?

What content/functionality would you like to see added to the website?

Please complete at least one field before submitting your feedback



Submit Feedback

Close











 




NYU College of Dentistry









Michael C. Alfano, DMD, PhD  

    							Professor Emeritus 
    						Basic Science and Craniofacial Biology 
 									E-mail: 
    			

Education
Certificate, Periodontics, Fairleigh Dickinson University School of Dentistry 1976PhD, Nutritional Biochemistry & Oral Biology, Massachusetts Inst. of Technology, Dept. of Nutrition & Food Science, 1971-1974Trainee, Periodontics, Harvard University School of Dental Medicine, 1971-1973DMD, University of Medicine & Dentistry of New Jersey 1971BS, Biology, Rutgers University 1967
Research Interests / Professional Overview
Improving the Quality and Efficiency of Higher Education, especially Dental EducationEnhancing Oral and General Health through Better Therapy, Public Education, andChallenging the Dental ProfessionPromotion of Improved Interactions Among Academic, Industrial and GovernmentScientists, the Regulatory Agencies and the Public Evaluation of New Products for the Personal Care, Dental, and Pharmaceutical IndustriesPathogenesis and Therapy of Periodontal Disease; Nutrition in Oral Health
Representative Publications
    			Complete listing available on the NYU Health Sciences Library site.
Search PubMed for articles. Alfano, M.C.: "The Origin of Gingival Fluid" J. Theoretical Biol.47: 127-136, 1974Alfano, M.C., Morhart, R., Metcalf, G. and Drummond, J.F.: "Presence of Collagenase fromClostridium Histolyticum in Gingival Sulcal Debris of a Primitive Population" J.Dent. Res. 53:142, 1974Alfano, M.C.: "The Effect of Ascorbic Acid Deficiency on the Barrier Function of Guinea-Pig Oral Mucosal Epithelium" Doctoral Thesis, 1974,    Institute Archives, Massachusetts Institute of TechnologyAlfano, M.C., Drummond, J.F., and Miller, S.A.: "Technique for Studying the Dynamics ofOral Mucosal Permeability in Vitro" J. Dent. Res. 54: 194, 1975Alfano, M.C., Miller, S.A., Drummond, J.F.: "Effect of Ascorbic Acid Deficiency on the Permeability and Collagen Biosynthesis of Oral Mucosal Epithelium" Ann. NY Acad. Sci. 258:253-263, 1975Alfano, M.C., Drummond, J.F., and Miller, S.A.: "Localization of the Rate-Limiting Barrier to the Penetration of Endotoxin through Non-Keratinized Oral Mucosa In Vitro" J. Dent. Res. 54: 1180-1182, 1975Inouye, L., Miller, S.A. and Alfano, M.C.: "The Lingual Ascorbic Acid Test: Lack ofCorrelation with Blood and Tissue Levels of Ascorbic Acid in Guinea-Pigs" J. DentRes. 54:1143-1148, 1975Alfano, M.C.: "The Role of the Host in Periodontal Disease" J.W. S. .Perio. 23:105-107, 1975Alfano, M.C.: "Controversies, Perspectives and Clinical Implications of Nutrition in Periodontal Disease" Dent. Clin. North Amer. 20:519-548, 1976DePaola, D.P. and Alfano, M.C.: "Tri-Phasic Nutritional Analysis" Dent. Clin. North Amer. 20: 613-633, 1976Alfano, M.C., Kaslick, R.S., Chasens, A.I. and Brownstein, C.N.: "Passively Generated Increase in Human Gingival Crevicular Fluid Flow" J. Dent. Res. 55:1132, 1976DePaola, D.P. and Alfano, M.C.: "Nutrition and Oral Health" Nutrition Today 12:6-32, 1977Feingold, J., Chasens, A.I., Doyle, J.L. and Alfano, M.C.: "Preserved Scleral Allografts in Periodontal Defects in Man" J. Periodont. 48:4-12, 1977Alfano, M.C., Chasens, A.I. and Masi, C.W.: "Autoradiographic Study of the Penetration of Radiolabelled Dextrans and Inulin through Non-Keratinized Oral Mucosa In Vitro" J. Periodont. Res. 12:368-377, 1977Alfano, M.C.: "Prospective Improvements in the Prevention of Periodontal  Disease" J. Prev. Dent. 5:26-29, 1978Alfano, M.C., DePaola, D.P.: "Methods for Assessing Nutritional Status in Dental  Practice" Quintessence Int. 9:115-125, 1978Alfano, M.C.: "Effect of Acute Ascorbic Acid Deficiency on the DNA Content and Permeability of Guinea-Pig Oral Epithelium" Archs. Oral Biol. 23:929-932, 1978Gillespie, B.R., Chasens, A.I., Brownstein, C.N. and Alfano, M.C.: "Relationship Between the Mobility of Human Teeth and Their Supracrestal Fiber Support" J. Perio. 50:120-124, 1979Saroff, S., Alfano, M.C., Chasens, A.I. and King, W.: "Sonicated Passively Dispersed Hydrogen Peroxide in Periodontitis: Effects on Clinical Parameters and Myeloperoxidase Activity" J. Perio. Res. 15:216-222, 1980Alfano, M.C.: "Nutrition, Sweeteners and Dental Caries" J. Food Tech. 34:70-74, 1980Vogel, R.I., Deasy, M.J., Alfano, M.C. and Schneider, L.C.: "Effect of Folic Acid on GingivalHealth in Women Taking Contraceptives" J. Prev. Dent. 6:221-227, 1980Alfano, M.C.: "Diet and Nutrition in the Etiology and Prevention of Oral Disease" J. Dent. Res. 59:2194-2202, 1980Alfano, M.C.: "Dental Caries: The Nature of the Problem" Cereal Foods 26:5-9, 1981Vogel, R.I., Alfano, M.C. and Manhold, J.H.: "The Effect of Intrasulcular Brushing on Sulcular Epithelial Permeability" J. Periodont. 52:224-250, 1981Alfano, M.C.: "Nutrition in Dental Practice: A Plea for Sanity" New York State Dent. J. 47:450-452, 1981Ritchey, T.W., Lamster, I.B., Mann, P.H. and Alfano, M.C.: "The Effect of Zinc Chloride on the Development of Gingivitis in Beagle Dogs Treated with Cetylpyridinium Chloride" J.Dent. Res. 61:1217-1220, 1982Lamster, I.B., Alfano, M.C., Seiger, M.C., Gordon, J.M.: "The Effect of Listerine Antiseptic on Reduction of Existing Plaque and Gingivitis" Clin. Prev. Dent. 5:12-16, 1983Howell, T.H., Reddy, M.S., Li, K.L., Alfano, M.C., Weber, H.P., Kaplan, M.C., Vogel, R., Williams, R.C.: "Inhibition of Plaque Formation, Prevention and Treatment of Gingivitis with Sulfadiazines in Beagles" J. Dent. Res. 68 (Spec. Issue): 1712-1713, 1989Howell, T.H., Reddy, M.S., Weber, H.P., Li, K.L., Alfano, M.C., Vogel, R., Tanner, A.C.R., Williams, R.C.: "Sulfadiazines Prevent Plaque Formation and Gingivitis in Beagles" J. Periodont. Res. 25:197-200, 1990Howell, T.H., Reddy, M.S., Weber, H.P., Li, K.L., Alfano, M.C., Vogel, R., Tanner, A.C.R., and Williams, R.C.: "Sulfadiazines Reduce Gingivitis and Plaque Formation in Beagle Dogs" J. Clin. Periodontol. 17:734-737, 1990Smith, M.A., Braswell, L.D., Collins, J.G., Boyd, D.L., Jeffcoat, M.K., Reddy, M., Li, K.L., Wilensky, S., Vogel, R., Alfano, M.C. and Offenbacher, S.: "Changes in Inflammatory Mediators in Experimental Periodontitis in the Rhesus Monkey" Infection and Immunity 61:1453-1459, 1993Li, K.L., Vogel, R., Jeffcoat, M.K., Alfano, M.C., Smith, M.A., Collins, J.G.,Offenbacher, S: "The Effects of Ketoprofen Creams on Periodontal Disease in RhesusMonkeys" J. Periodont. Res. 31:525-531, 1996Khandwala, A., Van Inwegen, R.G., Alfano, M.C.: "5% Amlexanox Oral Paste A New Treatment for Recurrent Minor Aphthous Ulcers I. Clinical Demonstration of Acceleration of Healing and Resolution of Pain" Oral Surg Oral Med Oral Path Oral Radiol Endod 83:222-230, 1997Khandwala, A., Van Inwegen, R.G., Charney, M.R. Alfano, M.C.: "5% Amlexanox Oral Paste A New Treatment for Recurrent Minor Aphthous Ulcers II. Pharmacokinetics and Demonstration of Clinical Safety" Oral Surg Oral Med Oral Path Oral Radiol Endod 83:231-238, 1997Alfano, M.C.:  "Dental Education: One Dean's Perspective" Journal Am College Dent. 68:8-12, 2002Alfano, M.C.:  "Titanium and Terrorism: The role of the implant dentist.  Journal of ICOI (in press) 2003Gordon, S.M., Heft, M.W., Dionne, R.A., Jeffcoat, M.K., Alfano, M.C., Valachovic, R.V., Lipton, J.A.: Capacity for Training in Clinical Research: Status and Opportunities J. Dent. Educ. 67:622-629, 2003More, F.G., Phelan, J., Boylan, R., Glotzer, D., Psoter, W., Robbins, M., Rekow, E.D, Alfano, M.C.: "Predoctoral Dental School Curriculum for Catastrophe Preparedness" J. Dent. Ed. 68: 851-858, 2004.Psoter, W.J., Alfano, M.C., Rekow, E.D.: "Meeting a Disaster's Medical Surge Demand"CDA Journal 32: 694-700, 2004Spielman, A.I., Fulmer, T., Eisenberg, E.S., Alfano, M.C.: "Dentistry, Nursing and Medicine: A Comparison of Core Competencies" J. Dent. Ed. 69: 1257-1271, 2005Glotzer, D., More, F.G., Phelan, J., Boylan, R., Psoter, W.J., Robbins, M., Rekow, E.D., Godder, B., Alfano, M.C.: "Introducing a Senior Course on Catastrophe Preparedness into the Dental School Curriculum" J. Dent. Ed. (Submitted)Petropoulis, V.C., Arbree, N.S., Tarnow, D., Rethman, M., Malmquist, J., Valachovic, R., Brunson, W.D., Alfano, M.C.: "Dean's American Dental Education Association Implant Workshop Survey" J. Dent. Ed. (Submitted)









Michael C. Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D. Appointed as Special Consultant to The OraPharma Board of Directors. - Free Online Library










Printer Friendly




	30,211,487 articles and books



Periodicals
Literature





Keyword
Title
Author
Topic













The Free Library > Business and Industry > Business > PR Newswire > September 26, 2001
The Free Library > Communications > News, opinion and commentary > PR Newswire > September 26, 2001
The Free Library
    > Date > 
    
2001 > 
        
        
        September > 
        
        
        26 > 
        
        PR Newswire









Michael C. Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D. Appointed as Special Consultant to The OraPharma Board of Directors.


Link/Page Citation



Page/Link:
	Page URL:
	

	HTML link:
	<a href="https://www.thefreelibrary.com/Michael+C.+Alfano%2c+D.M.D.%2c+Ph.D.+Appointed+as+Special+Consultant+to...-a078628052</a>

Citations:

MLA style: "Michael C. Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D. Appointed as Special Consultant to The OraPharma Board of Directors.." The Free Library. 2001 PR Newswire Association LLC 21 Jul. 2017 https://www.thefreelibrary.com/Michael+C.+Alfano%2c+D.M.D.%2c+Ph.D.+Appointed+as+Special+Consultant+to...-a078628052
Chicago style: The Free Library. S.v. Michael C. Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D. Appointed as Special Consultant to The OraPharma Board of Directors.." Retrieved Jul 21 2017 from  https://www.thefreelibrary.com/Michael+C.+Alfano%2c+D.M.D.%2c+Ph.D.+Appointed+as+Special+Consultant+to...-a078628052
APA style: Michael C. Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D. Appointed as Special Consultant to The OraPharma Board of Directors.. (n.d.) >The Free Library. (2014). Retrieved Jul 21 2017 from  https://www.thefreelibrary.com/Michael+C.+Alfano%2c+D.M.D.%2c+Ph.D.+Appointed+as+Special+Consultant+to...-a078628052



 WARMINSTER, Pa., Sept. 26 /PRNewswire/ --

 OraPhrama, Inc. (Nasdaq: OPHM) today announced that Michael C.
Alfano, D.M.D., Ph.D., Dean of the College of Dentistry at New York
University, has been appointed to serve as a Special Consultant to the
Board of Directors.

 In this capacity, Dr. Alfano will be advising OraPharma's
Board on matters relating to both scientific development and
commercialization of the Company's interests in oral care medicine.

 "Dr. Alfano has a unique combination of talents and interests
from which the OraPharma Board will benefit," said Michael
Kishbauch, President and Chief Executive Officer of OraPharma.
"Beyond his extensive exposure to the business aspects of
developing and selling products for oral care, he is a true visionary in
the scientific issues surrounding this field, with keen insights and
active involvement in the evolving future of this discipline."

 Dr. Alfano brings more than thirty years experience -- as an
educator, a practitioner, and a researcher -- in the field of oral
healthcare to OraPharma. Additionally, he has substantial expertise in
the development and clinical evaluation of new products for the dental
and pharmaceutical industries. The recipient of more than 40 honors,
including an appointment in 1994 to the NIH's National Advisory
Dental Research Council, Dr. Alfano's professional memberships
include the American Association for Dental Research and the American
College of Dentists. He is the author of numerous papers, abstracts,
texts, book chapters and magazine articles as well as creator of a
number of audiovisual teaching aids.

 Prior to being named dean of the College of Dentistry and Professor
of Periodontics and Basic Sciences at New York University, Dr. Alfano
served as the Senior Vice President for Research and Technology and a
member of the Board of Directors at the Block Drug Company, Inc. Dr.
Alfano currently serves as a Director on the Board of Dentsply, Inc.

 Dr. Alfano earned his undergraduate degree from Rutgers University
in 1967 and his D.M.D. from the University of Medicine & Dentistry
of New Jersey 1971. From 1971-1973, he attended Harvard University
School of Dental Medicine as a trainee in periodontics. In 1974, he
earned a Ph.D. from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. In 1976,
he received a Certificate in Periodontics from Fairleigh Dickinson
University School of Dentistry.

 The Company also announced that Christopher Moller, Ph.D. has
resigned from the Board of Directors, due to his growing
responsibilities at TL Ventures. The OraPharma Board of Directors is now
comprised of six members.

 OraPharma, Inc., a specialty pharmaceutical company with an initial
focus on the emerging field of oral health care, discovers, develops and
commercializes therapeutics for oral health. OraPharma's initial
product, Arestin(TM), which represents a promising therapeutic advance
for the adjunct treatment of periodontal disease, was approved for
marketing by the FDA in February 2001 and launched on April 2, 2001. The
Company's new product programs include OC-1012, a compound for the
prevention of mucositis, for which the Company recently announced the
initiation of a Phase 1 trial, as well as an agent for bone
regeneration, for which the Company expects to begin a Phase 1 trial
later this year, pending FDA clearance. In addition, the Company has
earlier stage technological initiatives focused on a next-generation
periodontal therapeutic and a dental trauma preparation.

 Statements included in this press release that are not historical
in nature are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning
of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These
statements include statements regarding its lead product, Arestin(TM),
and the success of the Company's sales and marketing efforts for
this product. In addition, these statements include statements
regarding new product development initiatives for mucositis, bone
regeneration, a next-generation periodontal therapeutic and a dental
trauma preparation. The Company cautions readers that forward-looking
statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties, which could
cause actual results to differ materially. Such risks and uncertainties
include the Company's ability to successfully market Arestin(TM),
the possible failure of clinical trials for the Company's product
candidates, the Company's ability to successfully market product
candidates in development, the Company's ability to achieve
milestones on which licensed rights for its product candidates,
including Arestin(TM), are dependent, the prospect of continued losses
by the Company, the Company's dependence on sole-source suppliers
for the production of Arestin(TM), and other risks and factors
identified from time to time in the Company's reports filed with
the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company claims the
protection of the Safe Harbor for forward-looking statements contained
in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The Company
disclaims any obligation to update the forward-looking statements in
this press release.

 Contacts:

 OraPharma, Inc.

 Michael D. Kishbauch, President and CEO 
 James A. Ratigan, Executive Vice President and CFO 
 (215) 956-2200

 Rx Communications Group

 Rhonda Chiger (investors)

 (917) 322-2569

 Pete Holmberg (media)

 (917) 501-7434

 MAKE YOUR OPINION COUNT - Click Here

 http://tbutton.prnewswire.com/prn/11690X88229356




COPYRIGHT 2001 PR Newswire Association LLC
  No portion of this article can be reproduced without the express written permission from the copyright holder.
  
Copyright 2001 Gale, Cengage Learning. All rights reserved.








Article Details

Printer friendly
Cite/link
Email
Feedback

Publication:PR NewswireGeographic Code:1USA
Date:Sep 26, 2001
Words:813Previous Article:Mexico Composite Indexes For July 2001.Next Article:Switzer Communications Wins Public Relations Society of America Compass Award For Handspring VisorPhone Launch.



Related Articles
Block Drug Corporation Announces Receipt of FDA Approvable Letter for Atridox(TM)
Dr. Jan Lessem Joins OraPharma, Inc. as Vice President of Clinical Research & Development and Chief Medical Officer.
OraPharma Completes Preclinical Development on Its Oral Mucositis Program.
OraPharma, Inc. Receives FDA Approval to Market Arestin(TM) For the Adjunctive Treatment of Periodontal Disease in Adults.
Rosenberg, Holt, Zinser and Ganeles P.A. Among First Periodontists in Nation To Use New FDA-Approved Treatment.
OraPharma Launches Phase I Trial of OC-1012 for Mucositis.
Harvard Researcher Presents Positive Data on OraPharma's OC-1016 Treatment For Bone and Tissue Regeneration.
Journal of Periodontology Publishes Study Showing Effectiveness of Arestin(TM) In the Adjunctive Treatment of Periodontal Disease; Study Finds...
OraPharma Announces Management Changes.








Publications by NamePublications by DateAuthorsLiterature


A-D
E-O
P-T
U-Z

before 1995
1995-1999
2000-2004
2005-2009
2010-

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

Terms of use |
	Copyright © 2017 Farlex, Inc. |
	Feedback |
	For webmasters

 









Business and Industry: Business: PR Newswire - Free Online Library







Printer Friendly




	30,211,487 articles and books



Periodicals
Literature





Keyword
Title
Author
Topic













The Free Library > Business and Industry > Business > PR Newswire
The Free Library > Communications > News, opinion and commentary > PR Newswire





Browse PR Newswire by date
2017
Jan, Feb (1, 7, 13, 14, 21), Mar (13, 15, 16, 20, 29), Apr, May, Jun, Jul
2016
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2015
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2014
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2013
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2012
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2011
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2010
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2009
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2008
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2007
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2006
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2005
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2004
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2003
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2002
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2001
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
2000
Jan, Feb, Mar 31, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1999
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1998
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1997
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1996
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1995
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1994
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1993
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1992
Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec
1991
Nov, Dec







Publications by NamePublications by DateAuthorsLiterature


A-D
E-O
P-T
U-Z

before 1995
1995-1999
2000-2004
2005-2009
2010-

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

Terms of use |
	Copyright © 2017 Farlex, Inc. |
	Feedback |
	For webmasters

 









PR Newswire: September 26, 2001 - Free Online Library







Printer Friendly




	30,211,487 articles and books



Periodicals
Literature





Keyword
Title
Author
Topic













The Free Library > Business and Industry > Business > PR Newswire > September 26, 2001
The Free Library > Communications > News, opinion and commentary > PR Newswire > September 26, 2001
The Free Library
    > Date > 
    
2001 > 
        
        
        September > 
        
        
        26 > 
        
        PR Newswire
    







Articles from PR Newswire (September 26, 2001)
1-300 out of 678 article(s)  next

Title 
Author
Type
Words

'Managing Flow' by John P. Ballis Featured as Book of the Month by the Institute of Industrial Engineers.


383

'Upside Magazine' Secures Financing for Continued Operations From MCG Capital.


402

/C O R R E C T I O N FROM SOURCE - Frisco Bay Industries Ltd./.


1429

[0] Trimble and InHand to Create Location-Enabled Handheld Device Platforms.


667

`Fraud Fighter' Awards Honor Two Veteran Investigators; IFPA Awards Go to Nationwide Insurance and Erie Insurance Employees.


566

1st State Bancorp, Inc. Declares Quarterly Cash Dividend.


124

2,150,000 Shares of Constellation Priced at $38.75 Per Share.


256

2002 AFMA Board of Directors Announced; Kathy Morgan Reelected as Chairman of the Board.


383

3DO Ships Jumpgate(TM).


354

711 Service Comes to Minnesota; Minnesota's Telecommunications Industry Announces a New Way to Access Minnesota Relay Services.


342

80 Year-Old St. Paul Florist Named 'Outstanding Older Worker' Of Nebraska.


787

AAA North Dakota Joins The Auto Club Group Holding Company.


295

AAA North Dakota Joins the Auto Club Group Holding Company.


289

Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Announces Performance Data and Portfolio Composition.


416

Aberdeen Commonwealth Income Fund Announces Performance Data and Portfolio Composition.


533

Accelerated Technology's Nucleus RTOS Selected for New Era of Portable Multimedia Devices, Varo Vision's PAVIC.


392

ACDSee 4.0 Hits Desktops Today.


810

ACR Group, Inc. Announces Alan D. Feinsilver to Join Board of Directors.


358

ACS Renews Major Outsourcing Services Agreement With Healthcare Business Resources.


446

Action Gaming Confirms Patent Infringement Lawsuit Against Alliance Gaming.


251

Adam Aircraft Announces Milestone Sales Figures.


341

Adolph Coors Company Board Increases Limit for 2001 Stock Repurchases.


88

Advanced Fibre Communications to Release Third Quarter Earnings On October 18, 2001.


457

ADVANCED FIBRE COMMUNICATIONS TO RELEASE THIRD QUARTER EARNINGS ON OCTOBER 18, 2001.


466

Advent Networks and Vesta Sign Strategic Marketing Agreement.


533

Affiliate of Nabors Industries Offers to Acquire Command Drilling.


737

AFL-CIO Sponsored Campaign Tour Featuring Democratic Judicial Candidates' Schedule for Western Pennsylvania, Wednesday, October 3rd Through Friday, October 5th.


323

Agfa to Acquire Autologic Information International, Inc.; Brings Richer Product Assortment to Broader Range of Customers.


850

AHFC Jumps Back Into Bond Market.


287

Air Force Association Announces National Awards.


1076

AK Steel's Butler Works First Steel Plant to Achieve Distinguished 'Star' Safety Designation; Earns OSHA's Voluntary Protection Program Approval.


851

Akonix Enables Interactive Content Environment Web Sites.


422

Allegiance Telecom Pre-Announces Third Quarter Results And Updates Guidance.


1272

Allegiance Telecom, Inc. Invites You to Listen to Preliminary Selected 3rd Quarter 2001 Results and Recent Developments Involving the Company.


412

Alliance & Leicester Selects Carreker Corporation's Cash Management Solution.


904

ALLIANCE & LEICESTER SELECTS CARREKER CORPORATION'S CASH MANAGEMENT SOLUTION.


900

Allou Health & Beauty Care, Inc. Schedules Fiscal Year 2001 Annual Meeting For Monday, October 15, 2001.


272

Allstate Public Service Announcement: 00:15 ALLSTATE MOBILE CLAIMS OFFICE Radio/Television Script.


86

Altair Announces Success at Camden.


522

Alteon Inc. Announces Investor Update Conference Call Wednesday, October 3, 2001, 2:00 P.M. Eastern Time.


569

American Axle & Manufacturing Awarded New Forging Business By Ford Motor Company.


323

American Credit Counselors Corporation Is Recommended for ISO Registration.


255

American Education Services Announces Partnership With Peterson's.


489

American Kidney Fund Medical Affairs Chairman to Meet With Congressional Black Caucus to Discuss High Incidence of Kidney Disease Among African Americans.


197

American Medical Security Launches eAMS.com to Support Independent Agent Channel.


713

American Physical Therapy Association Media Advisory.


116

American Standard Companies to Hold Third Quarter Earnings Conference Call on October 16.


280

American to Provide Special Separation Pay, Programs to Employees Facing Layoff.


602

Amerigon Finalizes Bridge Loan of Up to $1.5 Million.


353

AmeriResource Technologies, Inc. Announces the Acquisition of Jim Butler Performance From Wasatch Business Investors, Inc.


417

Analog Devices, Inc. Signs a Consulting Agreement With World Wide Video, Inc.


334

Anchor Glass Announces Adoption of a Stockholder Rights Plan And Lawsuit Against Owens-Illinois.


800

Ann Arbor IT Zone Invites Panelists to Discuss Advanced Internet Development In Michigan; Oct. 4 IT Forum Tells How Six Ann Arbor Companies Are Building Tomorrow's Internet.


412

Apple Reschedules QuickTime Live 2001.


193

Appleton Woman is Honored as 'Outstanding Older Worker' of Wisconsin.


783

Applied Industrial Technologies Receives 2000 Outstanding Distributor Award from Baldor Electric Company.


331

Aprisma Broadens Sales Focus in New England.


522

Aprisma Unveils New Technology Partner Program.


944

Aprisma's Spectrum Selected by Comcast to Aid in Fault Management of Critical Network Elements.


590

Arab Americans Support President Bush's Approach, Says American Arab Institute.


305

Arab and Muslim Americans Meet with President Bush.


304

ArteriA(TM) Announces Successful Completion of the First U.S. Case With The Parodi Anti Emboli System(TM).


457

ArTile Unveils First Member of SOC Family for Platform Convergence.


777

Asensio & Company: Congressional Wisdom of 'Inhibiting Short Selling' Seriously Questioned.


726

Atrix Submits New Drug Application for Leuprogel(TM) Three-Month Depot Prostate Cancer Product.


631

Attorney General Ryan Submits Anti-Terrorism Testimony To U.S. House Judiciary Committee.


745

Audiovox Corporation Reports Fiscal Third Quarter And Nine-Month Financial Results.


1123

August Jobless Rates Decrease in Most of Michigan's Major Labor Market Areas, Reports Michigan Department of Career Development.


2051

Auspex and EDUCOM To Showcase Combined Solution for Storing & Archiving Exchange E-mail at Microsoft Exchange Conference Beginning Sept. 30.


739

AutoZone Reports Fourth Quarter Earnings Of $1.07 Per Share Before Non-Recurring Charges, Up 27%; Same Store Sales Up 8%; Increases Share Buyback Authorization.


1582

AVANIR Pharmaceuticals to Present Strategic Overview During Virtual Investor Presentation Today.


644

Avant!'s SinglePass-SoC Solution Reigns Supreme.


351

Ball to Release Third Quarter 2001 Earnings on October 25.


382

Bay State Bancorp, Inc. Announces The Completion Of Its Seventh 5 Percent Stock Repurchase and The Approval Of An Eighth Stock Repurchase Program.


333

Bayer Long-Term Ratings Cut to AA- After Drug Withdrawal and Acquisition Talks; Still on Watch.


410

BCE Joins Other Global Technology Leaders to Form Liberty Alliance Project.


551

BEA Systems Secures 15-Point Lead in Market Share Over Competition in Deployed Application Servers as Confirmed by META Group Survey.


767

Beazer Homes Announces New $250 Million Three-Year Revolving Credit Facility.


314

Bianchi Public Relations Wins Contract For PPG Industries Automotive Coatings PR Project.


247

Billy Graham Announces June 2002 Outreach to be Held in Cincinnati.


697

BioTransplant Announces CE Mark Authorization for Second Eligix HDM Cell Separation Product for the Treatment of Cancer.


872

BlueArc Receives Frost & Sullivan Technology Innovation Award for Radical Network Attached Storage Market Introduction.


519

Boathouse Sports Offers Free American Flag Patches to Collegiate Athletic Teams.


197

Bob Barron Joins LightCross, Inc. as Chairman, CEO and President.


517

Bob Eccles - O'Melveny & Myers LLP Partner, and Lynn Parseghian, O'Melveny & Myers LLP Special Counsel - Able to Provide Insight And Commentary on the September 21 Status Conference Before Judge Kollar-Kotelly in the Microsoft Case.


152

Boeing Delivers First Full-Rate Production Super Hornet.


234

Bolt Takes Music to Teens With Ford Focus Sound Check Tour.


958

BresaGen and IGN Announce Agreement to Produce And Distribute Proprietary Stem Cell Delivery Device.


776

Brio Technology Extends Brio 2001 Conference Agenda With the Addition of Top Industry Figures.


591

BULLETIN: Magyar Tavkozlesi Plans to Increase Stake in Mobile Unit.


140

Business in Asia Today - Sept. 26, 2001.


948

Business Leader Joins Print Data Board.


514

By Any Means: New Survey Shows Americans Overwhelmingly Support Assassinations, War, Sanctions; Wirthlin Worldwide Survey Shows Resolve, Yet 45% Believe War Would Lead to More Terrorism.


713

C-COR Selected as Equipment Vendor for Kabel Hessen Network Upgrade In Germany.


826

CA'S COOL:Joe Auto-Deploys to Oracle9iAS.


501

CA's COOL:Joe is First to Pass Sun's Compatibility Test Suite for the J2EE V1.3 Platform.


563

CA's Unicenter Web Infrastructure Management Solution First to Pass Sun's Compatibility Test Suite For J2EE(TM) V1.3.


522

CAE signs new customer Frontier Airlines for Denver training centre and is set to initiate training at Madrid centre.


416

Cambrex Reviews Third and Fourth Quarters 2001.


617

Camden National Declares Dividend.


177

Camden Water Successfully Starts Phase II of Meter Installation Program.


390

Carnival Corporation Brands Achieve 97.7 Percent Occupancy Level for Past Week.


374

CART Announces Return to Rocky Mountain Area in 2002 With Grand Prix of Denver.


750

Cascade Natural Gas Corporation Announces Dividend.


94

Cash America Announces Intentions to Exit the Rent-to-Own Business.


787

Cash America Informed That innoVentry Will Cease Operations.


167

Cash Dividend Increased by 15% at United Security Bancshares Quarterly Cash Dividend.


343

Caterpillar and U.S. Army Partner in Recruiting Program.


546

CATS Sponsors Walkable Communities Workshops.


873

Cayman Islands 'Ready, Willing and Able' to Assist U.S. Authorities.


724

CELEBS BOW TO THE POWER OF THE PETAL.


386

Cendant Schedules Investment Community Conference Call.


190

Cendant's Vehicle and Financial Services Division Names David N. Siegel Chairman and CEO of Avis Rent A Car.


593

Chamberlin Edmonds & Associates, Inc. Announces the Appointment Of Mark B. Rinder as its Executive Vice President, Finance And Chief Financial Officer.


786

Charming Shoppes Selects Globix for Complex Hosting; Globix Will Help Bring E-Business to Charming Shoppes' Retail Brands.


730

Chart Receives $6 Million Contract.


218

Chicago Remembers Fund Website Created to Accept Online Donations For Disaster Relief.


264

Chico's FAS Announces Edmonds Promoted to President/COO; Gralnicks Intend to Extend Employment Contracts Until 2004.


634

Chubb CEO Says Insurance Industry Is Strong and Can Pay September 11th Claims, But Warns That Unavailability of Reinsurance Will Jeopardize Future Terrorism Coverage.


487

Class Action Filed on Behalf of Shareholders of PSI Technologies Holdings, Inc. Against Underwriters by The Law Firm of Schiffrin & Barroway, LLP.


465

Class Action Lawsuit Commenced on August 8, 2001 on Behalf of Purchasers of Metromedia Fiber Networks, Inc. (MFNX) by Abbey Gardy, LLP.


422

Clearwater Networks Adds VP of Marketing to Executive Management Team.


537

clickNsettle.com Reports Significant Gains in Operating Results and Sequential Quarterly Improvement.


1132

CMI Announces Developments Regarding Its Restructuring Plan With Company's Largest Creditors.


782

CMP XChange Announces CRN Test Center's Ultimate PC at Tech Builder XChange.


511

CoCreate Announces New Hosted Collaboration Service: OneSpace Select; New Solution Can Reduce or Eliminate Travel Needed for Product Design Teams.


565

Coldwater Creek Fiscal 2001 Second Quarter Net Sales Increase 7.6 Percent.


1930

Colombian Violation of Trade Act Forces USTR Complaint.


811

Colorado Department of Agriculture Recognizes Safeway With 'Colorado Proud Award'.


322

Columbia Records/Sony Music Soundtrax to Release Bandits (Music From The MGM Motion Picture).


528

Comcast to Host Third Quarter 2001 Conference Call.


266

Comerica Board of Directors Announces Leadership Succession.


754

Comerica to Hold Media Briefing at 9 a.m. (ET) Today, September 26.


212

COMFORCE Corporation Retires $18 Million of PIK Debentures in Exchange For Cash and Convertible Notes.


678

Commonwealth Biotechnologies, Inc. Signs Extended DNA Sequence Analysis Contract for Human Pathogenic Organisms.


467

Community Associations Institute Recommends Planned Communities, Condos and Co-ops Lift Bans on Display of Flags, Sample Moratorium Available for Associations to Adopt.


346

Compaq and Systech Join to Drive Retail Point-of-Sale Systems Based on Open, Industry Standards.


1148

COMPENSATION SCHEME DECLARES ANOTHER 72 FIRMS IN DEFAULT.


948

CompleTel Leases French Lambda Backbone from LambdaNet and Telia Intl. Carrier, Lowering Unit Costs.


424

Computer Associates Achieves J2EE 1.3 Certification For Unicenter and COOL:Joe.


503

Continental Chairman and President to Forego All Salary and Bonuses for The Remainder of the Year.


105

Continental Expects to Avert Over 1,000 Furloughs; Severance Costs Total Over $60 Million.


496

Corn Products International, Inc. Announces Conference Call At 7:30 A.M. CDT Today.


133

Corn Products International, Inc. Reduces Annual Earnings Guidance.


822

CoVest Bancshares, Inc. Expands Stock Repurchase Program.


171

Cox Technologies, Inc. Reports Improved Cash Flow and Flat Earnings For First Quarter of Fiscal 2002.


1051

Crescendo Ventures Report on Network Performance Services Identifies Risks And Investment Opportunities in Multibillion Market.


643

Cross Media Marketing and LifeMinders Announce Stockholder Meeting Dates.


1275

CSX Corporation Announces Third-Quarter Earnings Conference Call.


193

Cubist Pharmaceuticals Releases Cidecin(R) Mechanism of Action Data.


997

Cuyahoga Community College Graduation for the Thirty-Eighth Ohio Peace Officer Basic Training Academy.


137

CVRD Acquires BELEM.


204

Cyber Casino to Sponsor High-Profile Boxer; Golden Palace Promises to Change the Face of Advertising.


381

Danaher Signs Confidentiality Agreement With Cooper Industries.


326

Dean Foods Declares Dividend Payment.


177

Defenders of the Air Take Flight With Seagate Disc Drives.


741

DELTA ANNOUNCES EMPLOYEE AND NETWORK PROGRAMS.


1323

Delta Announces Employee and Network Programs.


1320

Delta Connection Carrier ASA Will Delay Regional Jet Expansion at Albany, Ga., Dothan, Ala.


522

Delta Pilots' Union Statement in Response to Furlough Announcement.


244

Denver Gold Group Invites You to Listen to Live Webcasts From Mining Investment Forum 2001.


296

Detroit Mayor Dennis W. Archer to Hold News Conference This Afternoon On Down Economy's Impact and Current City Contract Negotiations.


102

Devon Energy Announces Webcast Today.


564

DHB Industries Receives $18.8 Million Credit Facility From LaSalle Business Credit, Inc.


471

Diebold Affirms Third Quarter and Yearly Guidance; Expects Special Charge.


507

Digital Bridges Announces $18 Million Investment and Appoints New CEO.


719

Dominion Patent Position Strengthened By Favorable Court Decision.


324

Domtar pursues efforts to leverage the Web.


332

Don't Lose Sleep Because You Snore, Reminds the Academy of General Dentistry.


347

Donner Corp. International Issues Special Report On Defense Electronics Companies.


643

Dover Downs Entertainment, Inc. Announces Plans For 2002 Denver Grand Prix.


400

Dream Meet-and-Greet at Wet Seal!


232

DuPont Commercial Flooring Expands Its Carpet Recycling Capabilities.


451

E.piphany and Selectica Partner to Bring Intelligence and Precision to Complex Selling Environments.


887

Eastbridge Reports Double-Digit Growth in New Worksite Sales in 2000.


625

eDispatch responds to take-over bid circular of Proprietary Industries Inc.


676

Edmonton game developer named Entrepreneur of the Year.


320

eGIX Opens New Headquarters, Celebrates eGIX Day Proclamation.


751

Elcor Announces Management Changes.


808

ELISA Technologies, Inc. Has Licensed Auburn University Patent Rights for Tests and Test Kits for Detection of Ruminant Muscle in Animal Feeds.


350

ELISA TECHNOLOGIES, INC. HAS LICENSED AUBURN UNIVERSITY PATENT RIGHTS FOR TESTS AND TEST KITS FOR DETECTION OF RUMINANT MUSCLE IN ANIMAL FEEDS.


351

eLoyalty Joins Siebel Alliance Program as a Premier Partner.


391

Elsevier Science Introduces State of the Art Electronic Production Strategy; Creates the Global Production Department Structure.


372

EMMIS Communications Reports 2nd Q Results.


1328

Endwave Enables Rapid Design of 60 GHz Broadband Radios for Applications in New Unlicensed Frequency Bands.


1082

ENDWAVE ENABLES RAPID DESIGN OF 60 GHZ BROADBAND RADIOS FOR APPLICATIONS IN NEW UNLICENSED FREQUENCY BANDS.


1082

Energy Conversion Devices, Inc. Invites You to Join Its Fiscal Year End Conference Call on the Web, Sept. 28.


308

Entegrity and BEA to Host 8-City Series on Securing Next-Generation Portals.


669

Entergy Offers Third Quarter Earnings Guidance.


633

Enterprise Application Providers Meet Rigorous Certification Standards For Microsoft Windows 2000 Datacenter Server.


430

Entertainment International Ltd. Confirms Closing Date With CSTI.


140

eOptimize Inc. announces appointment to Director of the Board.


151

eOptimize Inc. selected as finalist for prestigious Microsoft awards.


257

Escopeta Oil & Gas and B.B.I., Inc. Announce Exploration Results in Cook Inlet Basin, Alaska; Estimated 12 Tcf of Recoverable Natural Gas Reserves Located.


391

Escopeta Oil & Gas and B.B.I., Inc. Announce Exploration Results in Cook Inlet Basin, Alaska; Estimated 12 Tcf of Recoverable Natural Gas Reserves Located.


391

EUROPEAN SOFTWARE AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MERGERS AND ACQUISITIONS CONFERENCE.


520

Executive Director Details Financial Impact of Reduced Air Travel On Metropolitan Airports Commission and Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport.


558

Exodus Communications Facilitates Financial Restructuring.


1104

EXX INC Reports Status of Repurchase Program.


186

F.N.B. Corporation, Promistar Financial Corporation Receive Regulatory Approval for Merger.


1138

Fairmont Hotels & Resorts Inc. announces normal course issuer bid.


445

Faith Community Responds: 'Who's Minding the Children?'.


123

Family Assistance Foundation: Resource Available to Enhance Your Ongoing Coverage of September 11th.


318

FBR Expands Coverage of Specialty Pharmaceutical Sector.


764

FDA Accepts Module 4 Of Imaging Diagnostic Systems Pre-Market Approval Application Of Its CTLM(R) System.


433

FDA Grants Market Clearance of Visible Genetics' HIV Genotyping System.


733

FERC to Appoint Settlement Judge to Help Resolve Issues Related to AEP's Corporate Separation.


387

Fire At Alpharma Site Expected to Have A Short-Term Negative Financial Impact.


472

Flagstar Bancorp Opens New Indiana Banking Center.


256

Florida State Honored by Air Force Association As Outstanding State Organization.


446

Flyers' LeClair to Launch Check Out Hunger Fund Raiser for Greater Philadelphia Food Bank.


394

Ford Motor Company - September U.S. Sales Results Conference Call.


215

Former INS Official Sentenced on Corruption Charges, Reports U.S. Attorney.


490

Formula Systems (1985) Ltd. to Acquire 37% of the Outstanding Ordinary Shares of Liraz Systems Ltd.


574

Fort Wayne Chapter Named Outstanding Chapter by Air Force Association.


298

Fortress Announces Third Quarter 2001 Dividend.


118

Fortune 500 Companies Rally Around Macromedia Flash For Online Advertisements.


722

Foundation Aids in Recovery; California Dental Association Foundation and Friends Donate $50,000.


254

Fourthstage Accelerates Cost-Cutting Measures.


134

Freddie Mac Launches New Euro Five Billion 10-Year EuroReference Note(SM).


246

FREDDIE MAC LAUNCHES NEW EURO FIVE BILLION 10-YEAR EUROREFERENCE NOTE.


246

Frisco Bay Delivers Strong Second Quarter Results - Revenues Up 36% - Earnings Up $852,000.


1339

Frontier Airlines Applauds Passage of Air Transportation Safety and System Stabilization Act.


295

Gasco Energy Presents at the John S. Herold Annual Pacesetters Energy Conference.


263

Gateway Joins With Software Leaders to Bring Comprehensive Computing Solution to Legal Industry.


985

GenCorp Announces U.S. EPA Has Filed 'Carve Out' Agreement to Remove Clean Land From Aerojet Sacramento Superfund Site.


529

General Motors, Turning the Practice of Warehousing And Distribution Inside-Out.


572

Gentiva Health Services to Present at Raymond James Healthcare Conference.


306

Gentra Systems Receives Product Differentiation Innovation Award in U.S. Nucleic Acid Isolation and Purification Markets.


404

GenVec Elects John H. Landon to Board of Directors.


533

Geoworks Presents Case for GPRS as the Natural Next Step for Mobilizing Data at Mobile Internet 2001 in Paris.


548

Geoworks Unveils Latest Version of AirBoss Application Platform Featuring Mobile Portal Manager.


832

GigaMedia Management Announces Intent to Purchase Shares.


498

Glenn M. Hamlett Joins FlowCycle, Inc. as Vice President of Sales.


372

Glimcher Realty Trust Schedules Third Quarter 2001 Conference Call.


181

Global Marine Schedules Release of Third Quarter 2001 Results.


275

Global Money Laundering Authority Alvin C. James Jr. Testifies Before Senate Banking Committee on Money Laundering and Global Terrorism.


724

Global SEMIndex Dips Amid Economic Uncertainty and World Events.


297

GlobalSpec Strengthens Its Position in Collaborative Product Commerce Market With SpecStation for Enterprise Product Data Management (PDM).


719

Globaltron Corporation Changes Name and Elects New Chairman.


990

Globecomm Systems Wins Four Contracts With an Aggregate Value of Approximately $5.6 Million.


411

GMAC Bowl to Feature Saturn VUE as Its 'Game' Vehicle.


623

Goldfield Corporation Awarded $4.2 Million In New Energy Construction Contracts.


310

Goodrich Facility Named One of America's Best by IndustryWeek.


435

Goodyear Revises Outlook, Releases Monthly Investor Update.


1326

GraficaGroup Named New Jersey's Finest Again.


674

Grand Toys International Announces Settlement of Securities Litigation.


405

Granite Construction Subsidiary Awarded Subway Reconstruction Contract In New York.


210

Gray Communications Systems, Inc. Announces Sale Of $200 Million Eight Year Term Loan Notes.


691

Grove Worldwide Consummates Plan of Reorganization; Commences Payments to Pre-Petition Vendors.


195

Halifax Awarded Three-Year Enterprise Maintenance Contract.


291

Hammertime Holdings' J. Slick Collection Prepares For Spring 2002 Fashion Roll-Out.


547

HENKEL SAVES ONE OF EUROPE'S MOST BEAUTIFUL CASTLES.


445

Heritage Commerce Corp Affiliate to Purchase Company's Common Stock For Employee Stock Program.


414

Heritage Communications Corporation to Form New Venture with Cirilium.


197

Hertz Reintroduces 'Freedom Rates'.


301

High Tech Academy Grand Opening.


255

HomeSeekers Launches XMLS System to the Third Largest US MLS Organization.


385

HomeSeekers.com Names Todd Kehoe as Chief Financial Officer; Management Team Significantly Enhanced With Experience in Finance.


259

Horizon Organic Reaffirms Commitment to Organic Stewardship; Launches Organic Agriculture Project.


1148

Horizon to Sail From Philadelphia; Zenith to Sail From Baltimore for Remainder of Bermuda Season.


310

Host America Corporation Announces 2001 Year End Turnaround Results.


430

Host America Corporation Signs $1.5 Million in New Business For 1st Quarter 2001.


376

Household International to Provide Credit and Financial Education During the Congressional Black Caucus Foundation's Annual Legislative Conference.


437

HP Acthar(R) Gel, Autoimmune Disorders Treatment, Now Widely Available After Four-Year Limited Access.


532

HP Acthar(R) Gel, Autoimmune Disorders Treatment, Now Widely Available After Four-Year Limited Access.


686

Hughes Network Systems Europe and Media Mundi Offer Point-of-Sale Advertising In 200 Tobacco and Toto Lotto Kiosks in Germany.


797

Human Resources Conference Features James Carville and 100 Exhibitors.


258

Huntington Bancshares to Sell Florida Operations to SunTrust Banks for $705 Million in Cash.


635

Hynix Introduces Innovative 'Blue Chip' Technology.


599

Hytek Receives $1.4 Million Subcontract For Remote Sensing Telemetry Components.


249

ICFJ Honors Courage and Commitment of Overseas Journalists During Fourth Annual Awards Dinner.


684

Identix Biometric Physical Access Control Systems Selected To Secure Facilities Across the U.S. for Major Prison System.


683

IDIGI Completes Broadband Wireless Network with Roaming in Iceland.


375

iGo Corporation Introduces New Line of Notebook Batteries.


547

IKON Names Lewis as Senior Vice President of Marketing.


392

ImageX.com Ranked 2nd Fastest-Growing Tech Company by Deloitte & Touche.


832

ImmuneTech to Develop Allergy Assays Based on Luminex's LabMAP Technology.


822

Immunex Corporation Appoints Laura Hamill to Vice President, Marketing For ENBREL(R) (etanercept).


350

IMPATH Offers Guidance for Q3; Provides Business Update and Reiterates Confidence in Fundamentals.


768

IMPCO Expands Position in Power Generation Market With Tecogen.


457

Initiative Media Online Survey Shows U.S. Consumers Resuming Normal Activity Patterns Following Terrorist Attacks.


246

Inmarsat Awards GBP 6M Deal to Logica Towards the Development of Its Higher Bandwidth Mobile Satellite Communications Network.


769

INRANGE and IBM Announce Support of Industry's Most Scalable FICON Director for IBM Enterprise Storage Servers.


1166

Institute for the Study of Aging Funds Helicon Therapeutics To Test New Treatments for Dementia.


441

Insurance Adjuster Smart-Claims Builds Global Online Claims Service in 90 Days On BEA WebLogic E-Business Platform.


821

Integrity Repurchases 818,897 Warrants (13.2% of the Company) From Bank Austria.


680

InterCept Announces Opening of Seattle, Washington Item Processing Center.


481

INTERNATIONAL OFFERS SNCF PRODUCTS AND SERVICES VIA RAILMASTER.


629

Intrado Expands Critical Wireless 9-1-1 Services; Helping Carriers Accelerate Implementation of Wireless 9-1-1.


1054

Inxight Launches VizServer, an Enterprise Application That Offers the Fastest And Easiest Way to Navigate and Understand Data.


674

IRC Reports Many Americans Support the Use of Camera Systems for Traffic Law Enforcement.


434

IRC Reports Special Licensing Laws for Teenage and Senior Drivers Favored by Most Americans.


435

Irwin Toy selects Cyberplex: CX to develop a system to merchandise Irwin products online.


304

Is the Future Success of Car Sales in Safety Features? just-auto.com.


312

iSuppli Expert Slashes Semiconductor Revenue Forecast in Light Of Recent Events.


423

ITEC Announces New Releases of ColorBlind Professional and Matchbox; First Manufacturer to Offer Color Management Software and Training at Bundled Prices.


692

iXL Proceeds With Merger Integration Planning.


484

Jaclyn, Inc. (Amex: JLN) Reports Operating Results For the Year Ended June 30, 2001.


356

Jacobson Resonance Enterprises, Inc. (OTC-BB-JRSE) Announces Annual Shareholders' Meeting.


193







Publications by NamePublications by DateAuthorsLiterature


A-D
E-O
P-T
U-Z

before 1995
1995-1999
2000-2004
2005-2009
2010-

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

Terms of use |
	Copyright © 2017 Farlex, Inc. |
	Feedback |
	For webmasters

 



